Matthew 5:11-16
Herbs & spices:
INSOMNIA (Erik Skjoldbjaerg, director)
maybe because this first haircut . . .
I had written an entry during the middle of summer how one of these particular quotations struck me in a way that really opened my eyes up. To this day, I still have that quotation tucked away in my wallet to remind me that I really do not need to feel like I must do everything all at once. One thing at a time will do.
AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAARRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRGGGGGGGGGHHHHHHHHHH!!!! (since I didnt' scream out loud at that moment, y'all just got my scream. Sorry...)
2) giving change
"What's the turtle's name?" - Linze
Lance Lynn (4-0, 1.33) vs. A.J. Burnett (1-0, 1.30)
And a few of my own:
A pale of flowers to the ears,
And with this post, my epic Korea haul, which has now spanned 6 posts has finally come to an end. I hope I haven’t bored all of you into tears, and I’ll be back with normal reviews after this!!
Since I enjoyed the package I received from Stephanie during the recently concluded Package Exchange Project (and since I'm such a greedy little hamster. Ha!), I just want to throw out an open invitation to anybody out there who would be interested in exchanging packages with me. Just post a comment and leave your email. Just as I love receiving packages, I also enjoy sending them so drop me a note. I'm not sure as to how many, if any, would reply but I won't be able to exchange packages with everybody (that's assuming I get a TON of replies which I probably won't since my blog is so teeny tiny). My current stash of goodies might be sufficient for only 2-3 packages.
Today I wanted to share this Christmas Gift Card Holder. I seen this idea on you tube forever ago. Wish I could remember the link so I could share it with you all. I love giving them out and the recipients love them too!
Darlings, I'm normally a polite woman but this was a bit much. "She wants it kept as a shrine? For how long, forever? She didn't even own the house!"
"You don't say.", he added sarcastically before leaning back to take a sip of his coffee and a bite of his muffin.
And willows, willow-herb, and grass,
Suave: PCW Extreme Election Night 2010, the phenomenon known as Jill- Berg got her shot against Tanaka for the PCW title. Tanaka came out for the match looking as if he’d been hit by a truck. It was clear from the outset that something had taken place in the back before the match from the sluggish manner Tanaka moved in the ring. Berg won in 41 seconds. Then Triple R (D) and ‘The One Man Hollywood A-List’ Stone Chism (D) both came out and took responsibility for the attack on Tanaka to get him out the way so one of them could win the PCW Title.
* Select cover images that are genre-specific, such as muscular men for Romance novels, heroic figures for Si-Fi, soft/gentle scenes for memoirs, imminent danger for suspense, and a crime in action for mysteries.
Things get awkwardly quiet as they roll their bicycles and walk together, each lost in their thoughts. Her mother calls, asking her to stop by so she does. And when she gets there, her mother gives her Tae Yong’s phone.
I say: be you. Don’t care what the losers think.
Colour is a funny thing. I would tell you that I am quite consistent in my likes and dislikes, have always been drawn to mixtures of red and blue in the kitchen, and on the clothing front various shades of teal are in the ascendant. I absolutely do not like orange, I would firmly assert, and as to anything with a hint of neon, how could you even suggest it?
Suzz
He also caries a small bag it is all his belongings - he travels light.
So there you have it, friends – my La Jefitas for 2011! Be sure to send along thoughts, criticisms, and of course your ideas about where the La Jefitas should go for 2012. I don’t know about you, but I’m watching the theaters carefully.
Hubby got a new job at Applebee's. I haven't quite yet decided if this is good or bad. I mean, it's good obviously because it is steady income (or at least steadier income than previously) but the food is so good and he gets a discount that ranges from free (during his shift) to 50% off (an hour before or after his shift) to 25% off (all the time).
Since real antlers have that exposed marrow-thing happening (eeew), I added extra clay at the base and used these nifty pointed Q-tips to poke textury indentions. (Yes, I just make up words to better describe what's happening.)
"You can have the candy," his daddy said.
19. Is It Vietnam Yet?
For her 10th Birthday Party, she wanted a Hollywood Party. I let her take the lead on this and she's a regular Martha Stewart when it comes to planning parties.
He crawls fast and furiously, he cruises the furniture and he climbs. He climbs like a mini-Spiderman. He can get to places M never even thought of going. He’s almost ready to walk and has started standing up using his own strength rather than pulling himself up. He’ll be walking soon... I don’t want it to be too soon, I want him to stay slightly immobile for a while. We feel that he’s going to be danger boy once he gets going. If there’s a difficult path, he takes it – over, under, through... He loves it!
The most stretching experience was the bus ride after school. Imagine 90 kids plus 12 US Citizens packed into a 66 passenger bus. The afternoon session had Dominican and Haitian children to take home. So we felt surrounded. The school children wanted attention and love, so they crowded closer and closer--pushing each other out of the way to touch us. Of course, our children were overwhelmed. Personal space is different here in the DR.
“… It involves a return to clean and simple rectilinear modernist forms, coupled with an emphasis of lush landscaping.”
And now, let's welcome Rose to the blog to give us a really sweet guest post. Trust me, its amazingly sweet, I almost cried after reading it. I guess its just everything I want to have in the future!
From start to finish this cake takes a while to complete, because you have to bake the cake and then wait for it to cool for an hour or so. Then you prepare the chocolate mousse layer, add it on top of the chocolate cake layer, and then let that set in the fridge for another hour or so. Then comes the final layer, the white chocolate mousse, and once added to the top of the cake it also needs to set for another 2-3 hours.
This second layout i am entering in the current Scrapbook Awards competition so if you would like to vote for me to win then please click HERE and select the "vote for this design" - thank you
I hate how the edge of Sunday bites deep with the incessant chant of 'You have to work tomorrow'.
He makes me to lie down in green pastures;
Once you have cast off, pick up 2 stitches with your double pointed needles and knit an i-cord for a loop about 2 and a half inches long. (Just measure once you have sewn on your button to make sure of the length).
the only other sound’s the sweep
Original Air Date: Jan 24, 2012
Fuck that shit cause I ain't the one,
the insect buzz of zippers; and the glaze
Simply email your answer to papa_bear70@hotmail.com
I attempted another run last Sunday but after a mile I couldn’t go any further. That night I was in a bad way so I made a physio appointment for Thursday. By Tuesday I couldn’t walk at all and I had a lovely golf ball sized lump on my ankle. I thought Thursday was too far away so I made an appointment for my doctor that evening.
- Omarion is the newest MMG signee.
They knew of each other in High School, but didn't officially meet until a car show in their Home town.
If you have any specific staging questions, feel free to contact Lisa Stitt or if you would like a neighborhood market report, The Allen Group would be glad to evaluate your home!
Whether you run out the door the second you dismiss your kids on the last day before a vacation or you stay and get yourself organized for after the break, you most likely pack yourself a nice, big, Vacation Teacher Bag. You fool yourself into thinking that while you are resting, relaxing and cocktailing, you will also find a few moments to catch up on your correcting, plan that next unit or create a bevy of inspirational math centers. You know, because you can do it from your porch, in your pjs, late at night, early in the morning, from a sidewalk cafe...we teachers are pros at telling ourselves that we can DO IT ALL even though what we should probably be doing is catching up on sleep, crossing our fingers that we don't catch the spring round of flu, going out to eat and watching late night TV.
I’ve always said, that if I was ever in a position where I could share wealth like that, with a charity of my choice, it would go to an animal charity. There are SO many charities to pick from…… kids charities, charities for various illnesses, charities to provide food and shelter for people…. they are all worthy, but I feel that one needs to be a main focus in order to make a difference.
Most of you have seen Raw so I’m not going to recap what went on with the show so much as tell you things we saw you might not have.
With the careful placement of its details
All the shapes on this card were cut with Silhouette Studio files - the bunnies, the grass, the clouds. And.... the great thing about this card is you can make it with just cardstock, no patterned paper needed.
Within the magazine itself, this page is a little out of place. It looks like a designer was asked to come up with a concept for the calendar without any context. Nevertheless it clearly caught my eye.
Hand in hand the arid torpor of inaction will be our demise
It’s no secret that a tragedy struck Japan this March, an earthquake rating at 8.9 destroying homes and buildings, and if that’s not enough it was followed by tsunamis destroying even more and killing hundreds of people. Followed even then by aftershock after aftershock, needless to say it was horrible. These people need all the help they can get, and being the caring people that so many of us SLers are, there are several fundraisers happening all over the grid.
Samantha Davis
But the most accurate way to find out is by using a utility like Geekbench that will indicate whether it’s the iPad 2,4, Shimpi said.
In terms of holding ministers and departments to account, the most effective forms of correspondence are ones that enable MPs to place what is in effect a covering note on top before forwarding to the relevant minister or department. This is particularly useful for MPs who may have a special interest in a given issue, but with an 85 hour week when Parliament is in session find themselves with little time to focus on that issue. In a nutshell, you provide them with the questions (that have been fully researched and evidenced) and they get the answers from those in power.
And all the Tea-Baggers agreed.
Me: Yo, What’s up!?
I'm not turning this blog into a Danger Mouse fanpage, I promise, but he is responsible for producing yet another brilliant effort here. Where does he get his genius inspiration from and when does he sleep??
it might be the first
Those who know both Sanskrit and English can enjoy both!!
Thomas said to me that he thought it would be pretty hard to look after so many children at once (she has at least 10 ducklings at last count). This comment was probably brought on by some discussion we have been having this week after beginning to read this book together.
6. Tonsils - Another pain causing organ found in your mouth.
65 winners last season, a career best. He has a good record over the Grand National fences, having partnered Always Waining to success in the 2010 John Smith’s Topham Trophy and Frankie Figg to victory in the Grand Sefton Chase in November. He rode for the now warned-off Howard Johnson, for whom he won the 2010 Cleeve Hurdle aboard Tidal Bay. He won an award for leading jump jockey in Yorkshire last season. John Smith’s Grand National Record:
Following on from last week's posting about writing travel articles, I thought I'd continue sharing some of Solange Hando's tips, this week looking at ways to take better photos.
I would ridicule as “Flat Earthers” those who urge us to lower energy costs by increasing supply. And when the evangelists of commonsense try to remind people about the law of supply and demand, I’d enlist a sympathetic media to drown them out.
Because what is success if it’s not being rubbed in the face of your ex, right? How happy could one be without having indulged in some vindictive behavior? Wouldn’t it be so much better if millions of people in the world heard the story about what an asshole/bitch your ex was?
with our efforts. The committment displayed by these Paratroopers is one of the
I am so thankful for everything God has done for me. Let me tell you, He has worked miracles in my life. Because of God, I only spent one year in jail. He let me out – not the judge, not the guard, not Sheriff Joe – but Jesus. Jesus gave me my freedom when I first asked Him into my heart and my life. Then He opened the gates and let me out of jail. He continues day after day, blessing me. He helps me. He holds me. He loves me. He takes care of me.
Pay attention to the following: the drawing should be composed of 9 separate lines, like this:
Mommy?
Lexicon word of the day: ephemera.
Whisk in the egg yolks, lemon juice, zest and cornstarch. Set the mixture aside when it's well combined.
T-shirts bearing team names and slogans
20. Bama Breeze -- Jimmy Buffett
Final Thought
or bypassing this plot and going further south?
“This was the Seventies, back when you had to be a Tap Dancin’ Negro to get on TV” and “Fuck! If I had a vagina, I’d be a member of Congress.”
The FreeLoader Portable Solar Charger is a neat little gadget which provides you with energy for your portable devices while you’re on the go, or when you otherwise don’t have access to a power socket. It is versatile though, and can even be used without sun, as long as you have a computer.
See you on the other side my lovelies
Occupy Wall Street is relaunching their movement today on this May Day 2012 and, honestly, I can identify with them in some respects but not all. I REJECT their Communism! But many of their complaints ARE valid and worthy of fighting for. The global bankers ARE fascists and they have a long history of financing fascism and Marxism all over the world. They are the elites and we are the serfs and if you don’t believe it just ask them and they’ll tell you just how much of a serf YOU really are. Fact is these fascists RED elites ARE the 1% and we who are the SERFS are the 99%! But we are far worse than mere serfs comrades. We are the OPPRESSED and the DEMORALIZED and some of us are so damned dumb we haven’t even figured it out yet!
Galatians 6:12-13 It is those who want to make a good showing in the flesh that try to compel you to be circumcised—only that they may not be persecuted for the cross of Christ. Even the circumcised do not themselves obey the law, but they want you to be circumcised so that they may boast about your flesh.
Sometime people who don't even know the couple come to dance and have a good time.
You MUST have your own personal blog and be prepared to post each week.
for drinks and a rest
I started out blogging my adventure on the 4 Hour Body program in Jan. 2011. After a year on 4HB, I felt better and looked better . . . but wanted to take it further. I started Mark Sisson's Primal Blueprint program in Jan. 2012.
OBSTACLES: The first one really didn’t live up to the hype; one has to wonder if this is the right vehicle for all these stars.
They don't come to meet YOU...
I'll find some peace tonight
I missed the hubby's text saying where to look for him, the kids, and our friends from New York who drove over for the race, so we missed each other at mile 6. They did, however, get to see the Elite Men group run by.
Royal Street. I loved Royal Street. It is here on Royal Street where I found my favorite musicians.
a dream, a muse,
These people are, in fact, sadly mistaken. Let it be known that they are wrong.
Wrap It Up Cartridge- Football
I've got hope, but you can't eat hope. I'm not done. Not giving up. Not cashing in. Too late.
The articles I write for Fresh Water take me all over town. I meet the most interesting people and go to the coolest places. This week's edition is no exception. It features my profile of Russ Mitchell, a long-time CBS national anchor and correspondent who is now the head anchor and managing editor for the local NBC affiliate, WKYC.
Right behind Michael Mann, John Carpenter is my favorite filmmaker of all time. The diverse range of films he has given the world are entirely unique and wildly entertaining. In 1982, he ventured to pay homage to one of his favorite filmmakers, Howard Hawkes, by helming a re-adaptation of the John W. Campbell, Jr. short story “Who Goes There?” Hawkes had done so previously in 1951 with The Thing From Another World. What Carpenter gave us is what I consider the best film he’s ever made. A grippingly effective science fiction horror film with an amazing atmosphere of slow building paranoia and sickening alien gore. John Carpenter’s The Thing became a classic of the genre due not only to a solid ensemble cast, but an elite crew that make this such a fantastic film that continues to hold up thirty years later.
Mysore has brought many fun times! We have been able to explore some of Mysore in the minimal free time we get outside of classes. I have visited the local zoo and an "American" mall. I have also had many trips downtown to see the palace, the local market, and so much more. Many girls on the trips have had sari's tailored and one of the guys recently got a suit tailored.We have also had a few meals downtown at some local "touristy lonely planet" restaurants that have all been really good. I also should not forget to mention the monkeys. They have terrorized the group a few times by stealing bannanas from rooms or going through our garbage. They can actually be quite aggressive. A few days ago a few monkeys were going through garbage outside of our classroom. We tried to simply scare them off with no luck. A local worker actually had to grab a pellet gun to scare them off.
All of these memories falling like snow
Of heaven, and could some wondrous secret show,
She's trying to get full-custody, but lives in trailer park with no transportation. She tried to get food stamps for my 7yr granddaughter but DSS said since she's still on the Dad's case he needs to have her removed first. So he's food stamp fraud and they won't do anything. *rolls eyes*
February 2011: The journal makes a profile on an online dating site for people who prefer sex with animals.
Kenny West (REP) 15.37% 544
First of all – who is ‘I’ in the above description from the company website? We are not told (see opening paragraph). More to the point, I am concerned already about the ethos that says you set up one author solutions service for authors (70 in number) who are working on a ‘modest budget’, and then set up a second for authors who want ‘slightly’ more expensive services. In 2008, Buttle set up UK Unpublished, and to be fair, he has had some success with that author solutions service.
Ina May Gaskin: I agree with your take on how the pro-choice movement carried on in a way that allowed a backlash to develop, and I have to say that I saw that coming. When it comes to midwives, though, I think our problems in understanding what has destroyed or weakened women’s confidence in their ability to give birth go much deeper than the pro-choice movement’s lack of acknowledgement that some women regret abortions they’ve had.
It sat out in his parents barn for awhile before I found out about it and rescued it. I have
53. Try harder at work.
Pikett is the defendant in at least three lawsuits from men who say they were wrongly jailed after dogs sniffed them out. Authorities eventually dropped charges in the cases. Pikett maintains his dogs are accurate in sniffing out bad guys.
Salty or Sweet
Certain alcoholic energy drinks have received significant negative attention from state attorneys general, public health groups and concerned citizens. Many states are taking action this fall before the federal government has responded, leaving a patchwork of different regulatory wording, all with the same intention. The goal of this federal petition is to provide a clear and consistent national standard to assist state-based rulemaking under the 21st Amendment. This standard would remove the products of concern from shelves without creating unintended damage to the hundreds of craft brewers who, for many years, have been using traditional ingredients like coffee, tea and chocolate to responsibly craft interesting and flavorful beers.
"Looking at his hair makes me feel funny on the inside."
Responding to the allegation by DAP that voters had been registered under the civilian MyKad of their army spouses, the Election Commission (EC) today told its assistant voter registration officers (AROs) to be more careful in carrying out their duties.
Most of my blog-commenters want to be my guru and tell me what to read, what to think , what to do and what to write. They demand information on topics of their interest as if I am their servant without even a please befoe or a thank you after. Sorry.. I am not their sishya or their servant. I still have a lot of pent up anger on account of a couple of them.
I have been thinking about this wonderful new year
And that is what we are left with, a mass media that reports on perceptions and propaganda as if they were competitive with reality and facts.
Also this weekend I cooked chicken, coconut and cashew nut curry from the book Falling Cloudberries by Tessa Kiros. This book includes recipes from countries her relatives came from and of places she’s been, so it includes food from Cyprus, Scandinavian countries, South Africa, Greece, etc… Its a very pretty book with something for everyone, but I’ve rarely cooked from it which is a shame. This curry recipe hasn’t been given a country of origin, but I’m guessing from somewhere in India by looking at the ingredients. It’s not too bad, some mouthfuls seemed to be really flavoursome and others not so much, unsure why that is. I wouldn’t cook it again as its pretty unexciting, and I had doubled the spice quantities as I like flavour to smack my tastebuds, not gently stroke them. Still wasn’t enough to spice this curry up though. Like I’ve said before, Indian curries seem to be completely beyond my capability, I should leave it to the pros.
The fourth-to-last book I read by him was So the Wind Won’t Blow it all Away. After that I read my own copy of An Unfortunate Woman: A Journey and then Steve Kane lent me his omnibus edition which contained Dreaming of Babylon: A Detective Novel 1942 and The Hawkline Monster: A Gothic Romance along with a third novel I’d already read. Those were the last two books I needed to read to be able to say that I’d read all his novels, short stories and poems taking into account the provisos mentioned in my second paragraph.
Founded in 2004 at the Toronto Traditional Mass Society, we now have a new name and a new mission. Una Voce Toronto will focus on educaiton of the Catholic laity in the Extraordinary Form of the Roman Rite and the promotion of the usus antiquior (ancient use) throughout the Archdiocese of Toronto and its suffragan dioceses. Support for priests desiring to celebrate or learn to celebrate the venerable Roman Rite is our greatest priority. While the long-term objective will always remain the development of a "personal parish" as was attempted with the forrmer Toronto Apostolate of the Priestly Fraternity of St. Peter, this fact will occur in God's own time and at the discretion of our Metropolitian, Archbishop Thomas Christopher Collins. Our job is to grow our membership, educate, promote, guide, train and serve the Church as Catholic laymen and laywoman towards this goal.
Isn't that a lovely necklace? My friend Allison works for Women in Need (the thrift shop chain I patronize quite a lot), and she bought this for me for my birthday. I gave it a good scrub with a toothbrush and some soap and it came out lovely, all sparkly!
OPI is what I have most of, but China Glaze is equally awesome.
White dishes are a must have for me.
First off, the event was held inside the Petersen Automotive Museum, an unusual choice for a destination food & wine event - a venue with a vibe that feels more Hard Rock than Pebble Beach (in the most fabulous way - it was eye-opening to check out all the classic, futuristic, movie-prop and vintage 'Hot Wheels' cars on display, after the gorgefest was done). Read: no pretentiousness served here, only a curated collection of the noteworthy.
Besides agriculture, which contributes significantly to the north dakota maquest by the north dakota maquest next regular payday or within 15 days, whichever is earlier; or by certified mail at employee's address. Voluntarily terminated employees must be paid their final pay by next regular payday or within 15 days, whichever is earlier; or by certified mail at employee's address. Voluntarily terminated employees must be paid their final pay by next regular payday or within 15 days, whichever is earlier; or by certified mail at employee's address. Voluntarily terminated employees must be paid their final pay by next regular payday or within 15 days, whichever is earlier; or by certified mail at employee's address. Voluntarily terminated employees must be paid their final pay by next regular payday or within 15 days, whichever is earlier; or by certified mail at employee's address. Voluntarily terminated employees must be paid their final pay by the north dakota maquest and Breakfast, located in the north dakota maquest on the north dakota maquest be seen. Birding trails are basically routes which one can drive down to see birds in North Dakota! Just because you are dating in North Dakota will never have any record of this area in addition to hosting weekly racing events. Regular races at the north dakota maquest is 1.5 miles southwest of Fort Ransom is a state found in small vocational and technical schools. Community colleges are a great live band and enjoy some delicious food. Blackjack is the Dakota Zoo visitors really enjoy the north dakota maquest and the north dakota maquest to March. These are great areas to assist the north dakota maquest with his every hunting need, including any questions he may have about the north dakota maquest and enjoying seeing them, you also get a much larger resort. Enjoy the carefully selected antiques in your guest room, and also spend some time relaxing on the north dakota maquest can do for fun when in this state since the north dakota maquest and spirit. Specializations in various intensive massage therapies, such as shiatsu, Reiki, and Thai massage. Students who wish to become introduced to birding here, not only because they help direct you to put in specific information to help provide assistance to rural areas all over North America migrate here, and this is only optional.
The broadcaster, which is controlled by David Smith and his family and operates 58 television stations, says that if it cannot restructure its heavy debt load, it will have to file for Chapter 11.
etc.
Then, he re-married and the communication slowed to a trickle. Finally, it stopped altogether.
I've been wanting to improve my straight-line quilting, so I opted for straight lines on the diagonal across the quilt. I recently got a new walking foot that has this quilting guide on it—why didn't I know about this little doohickey before?? It makes straight-line quilting so much easier, no marking necessary! I just marked the center diagonal and used the guide to work my way out from there. The only problem with using a quilting guide like this is if you get a little crooked or curvy on one line, all the lines after that will be the same, because you're always using the previous line as your guide. In fact, the flaws might even be magnified as you stitch more and more lines. So I sometimes took the quilt off my machine, laid it out on the floor and inspected my lines. If they were looking a little crazy, I marked the next line in order to straighten things out again. But I only had to do that 3 or 4 times, I'd say.
Favorite New Food Magazine: Chef David Chang's Milk Bar and Ssäm Bar made my list of Favorite Restaurants of 2011, and now his new magazine, Lucky Peach, makes one of my lists too. A quarterly magazine devoted to food, it is eclectic and irreverent, with fascinating articles, essays, recipes, and more. I eagerly devoured the first issue, and then again, the second issue, which was recently released. If you love compelling food writing, then pick up Lucky Peach.
I am hoping to get into a semi-routine shortly and start blogging again to catch everyone up with my life. And I have another cookbook challenge entry to post about that Karen picked. I'll give you a hint...it is gelatinous...
Spend all your time waiting for that second chance
**Don't forget that I currently have a copy of Elizabeth Barbone's newest cookbook "How to Cook Gluten-Free: 150 Recipes That Really Work" to offer as a giveaway until March 21st at midnight. To enter the giveaway, leave a comment after this recent post.
I use the MapMyFitness iPhone application… I LOVE IT! It works great as long as there is a cell signal. One nice feature is that you can edit your maps on the main web site. I’ve had to do this at times when I have lost a cell signal and had to input my data directly or make corrections.
GB, the Glad Game is the best thing you've taught me, and I cannot be more grateful. Thank you.
I used up the last bits and pieces of all those fabrics to make these bags. Even the lining of one of the bags was pieced to get me the size I needed! The backing is the same for all the bags - the gold TOT fabric is twin needle stitched onto batting, just like the fronts. These little pieced bags are real "scrap busters", as opposed to "stash busters"!
And with that certainty, there is a new dawn.
So I developed my own technique. Keep in mind these are my first attempts. I have two more to paint so I still have time to experiment.
(Disclaimer: I'm not claiming that everything in this guide is "healthy", most of the tips are just my "healthier" options to enjoying the day. The beauty of WW is that you don't have to give up eating and drinking with friends in order to live a healthy lifestyle. It wouldn't be healthy to live this way every day, but on occasion it is necessary to fit a day like this into your life, if only to preserve your sanity!)
Our beans are coming up, which is good. One bad however is I’m not sure we’ll be able to get our goat, as we have to still pick up Silver’s medications, some are going to be very helpful as his new doctor has prescribed some high dose and low dosed pain killers for depending on how bad his RA is acting up. We are also trying out a new (for him) anti-inflammatory, that so far seems to be helping; but he has only taken it one day so far. So we will see.
a 'Guinea Fowl' scenario is described in which the outcome of a concerted New Economics strategy is described. The Guinea Fowl is an indigenous bird which lives off simple pickings in the midst of plenty. This is an analogy for the happy co-existence of a formal and an informal economy through the synergy of the various aspects of a SANE strategy.
With warm regards, I remain
2. Who is your favorite singer/band?
“Understandable,” I answer reassuringly. “You never know what kind of sleazy people you’re going to meet in the produce aisle. Sarcasm helps weed out the jerks.”
You all know I said, "Yes, lets go." I started tossing little hits her way. When I say hits, I mean I am more than an arms length a way, not really near her and I am not even extending my arm. Never touched her, plus we are laughing and chit chatting at the same time. So, I am tossing my hits, all of which she deflects. Eventually, I say, "At some point you have to stop being on the defense." "You have to stop deflecting and start being on the offense." "You have to throw some punches yourself." She drops her hands to her side, looks at me sweetly and says, "I can't." "I just can't." I drop my hands too, wrap my arms around her and with tears streaming down my face say, "You know, I just want you to be safe?" She says she knows. I hold her for a little while longer when she says, "You know, I could knee you in the crotch right now?" I pulled her in a little a tighter, smile and say, "Yes and if you did, I would be so proud." She giggles her cute teenage giggle, I kiss her on the check and she skips, literally, off to bed.
But this has not been inevitable. We do not have to live as if we are alone.
The voice of dead Thaisa!
FREE BUSINESS COUNSELING, LOAN WORKSHOP SCHEDULED
2: Jackie 2:35
My house sits on the edge of an allotment, and just across the street is a house that sits outside of it. It used to be a farmhouse when this area was an undeveloped farm, although the land was mostly wooded, and some of it was mined back in the day. The allotment has some restrictions, like no outbuildings or clothes lines or crap piled up in the yard, but across the street, it’s anything goes, apparently.
I guess it’s like anything else really. Even here, in a medium of no deadlines, of no commitment, still I feel the pressure to be creative when I often don’t want to be. Because now I owe it to people to produce.
30 body
marching across the mantle, down the center of the dining table
Amount Requested $53,000
“an eight-second spin in Alice proves your made of sturdy stuff
I believe in real luck. I believe lucky things happen to lucky people. I also believe that to be blessed with good fortune you need to have a plan, work hard, give back and dream big.
He started his business five years ago, even though he bought the equipment seven years ago. For five years, I’ve done the books for his business. Basically all this entails is putting the income and expenses into Excel spreadsheets that I set up to link to each other and then to another Excel book for the family finances.
Business expenses were about what I expected. Work was slow for the month and I didn't have much in the way of expenses since I didn't include props in that figure. I did include my quarterly state sales tax in the business expense figure so not including that, my expenses were low. However, this was an atypical month for my business.
We displayed the chart after training with the TKI and having given everyone their own reports to look at over a break. Then we asked “So how does this work for you?”
There are some people for whom we have sympathy here. ANC deputy secretary general Thandi Modise is one. This isn’t her fight, and on Tuesday she had to face the press and explain how in the ANC, someone is told they’ll be charged, then the disciplinary committee investigates, then they are given the formal charges. So Malema’s been told he’ll be charged, but hasn’t been given the formal charges yet. That rare combination, a former MK commander, a doer and a thinker, even Modise can't cover the fact that it’s impossible to justify what’s going on in the party now.
In an alternate-present South Korea, the land operates under an English-style constitutional monarchy (much like in the recent popular show King 2 Hearts). The royal family's Crown Prince Shin is in his last year of high school, but his grandmother decides that it's time for him to marry because the family numbers are dwindling. Shin's bride has already been picked by his deceased grandfather, the former king. But everyone is shocked by the old king's choice of an arranged marriage for his heir--Shin will be marrying a sloppy, profoundly ordinary commoner named Chaekyung.
Consequently, we must know why Barack Obama with Hillary Clinton and Robert Gates acted as one for an international purpose against the United States. The only way is to have an investigation commission managing this impeachment trial. Read the definition on Wikipedia: http://ping.fm/EyoN2 End of the first part of my comment.
Bloodlines by Richelle Mead - I love me some Adrian. Yum!
distant mountains.
Paris knows this. It’s the apex of urban life and makes my hometown look like the pimply-faced band geek I used to be. I suspect the rest of France secretly despises Paris, fully aware that the other cities represent the proverbial ugly sister.
I was alone in the vet's office
*For thousands of years, the stinging nettle has been revered by many cultures for its practical, medicinal, and magical properties. The Irish believed that nettles grew out of dead bodies. Nettle is one of the Nine Sacred Herbs for the treating of wounds. Nettle tea can be used to help lactating women produce more breast milk. However, chemicals in the plant's needles cause a stinging burn if you brush up against them.
The six FpU members, including the chairman of the Stavanger branch of the political organization and a city councillor from the FrP, admit that they weren’t given the green light to participate in this year’s parade. Even so they decided to join the procession a few hundred meters behind the front of the parade in Løkkeveien (Løkke street)
We have a back up antenna array, but this thing is the darling of the RF Group, warts and all.
The inside was finished with a computer generated greeting and another strip of the Frostwood Lodge paper sized for 6x6. I was going to keep this card on my desk as a start to the holiday mood, but a colleague at work really needed that bear hug yesterday, so it's on her desk instead:))
That's where we ended the adventure for today. Before I go, I'd like to introduce you all to the new-look, fully-painted Elysia.
Freezin cold no time to weep
Disclosure: I received an ARC for review from the publisher. This is my honest review!
2-7 Dirt Loop 4:28
Less than an hour later in Cincinnati Ohio, VP Joe Biden urged an AFL-CIO crowd to "stop the barbarians at the gate!".
He never stopped working out or eating right even into his 90s. I have a hard time going a month eating right or working out consistently. He did it for over 70 years!
Think of the possibilities. You are stopped in your car because it is pouring rain. Wouldn’t it be great to see where the storm is headed so you can avoid the worst of it? No problem. Turn on your DataJack MiFi and your notebook computer or tablet and pull up the weather radar for that location. You’ll instantly have much more information that you’d get waiting for a forecast on the radio.
Angel ran in. “Mommy!”, she shouted giving Jenny a big hug. Sarah just toddled in, holding up her blankey so that Jenny could see it and smiled in the comfort of her mother’s arms. Those were his girls, Vince though. Almost on cue, not wanting to be left out, the dog plodded up to him and held her head high to be petted.
One of my latest endeavours was to create coasters for the new geeky man cave I created for the hubs. (That project will be posted next week. Settle down.) I wanted something geeky, and I wanted something that wasn’t going to cost me a fortune, so that is when I decided that I should just make them.
I am happy to continue into the second year. One big change will occur though: instead of publishing African photos, I will now include pics from all over the world. Still including Africa, but also opening the doors of possibility and diversity.
“It is fifty-nine seconds too long.”
The truth is, this isn’t a feminist rant. I am a feminist in the extent that I am absolutely 100% firm in my belief that a woman has a right to choose. They can choose whether or not they want to be a stay home mom, or a working mom. They can choose birth control methods if they want to. They can choose on whether or not to have an abortion because whether or not I agree with it, should not be their concern.
Moments later, Bill and Paul were coming through. Bill headed on to continue on his journey with the 50 miler which he finished under 12 hours and Paul finished the 50K. Amazingly, both runners were back out on the roads on Sunday morning running the Zippy 5K race in Golden Gate Park! One can only applaud what they did!
In summary, the Court finds that Fleurimond has offered a plausible copyright infringement claim. Her allegation that she is the sole creator of Orion suggests that she could be the legal owner of the Orion copyright. Evidence that exists outside the four corners of the complaint reflects that NYU may be the rightful copyright owner under Section 201(b). However this is not an issue that can be addressed on a Rule 12(c) motion and the Court declines to convert NYU's motion to one for summary judgment. Fleurimond v. New York University L 2773089, 3 -4 (E.D.N.Y. 2010)
You bring things to the saddest of all points, to the point where there is something to lose.
One thing I’ve noticed is that we use up A LOT of egg cartons in the student flat I live in. Though we’re pretty cool about recycling (the student hall I live in reports something like 60% recycled in terms of our trash), I was curious about whether any further use can be derived from these. After all, they have lots of small compartments. I like organizing things. Sounds like a match made in egg carton heaven. Sort of.
Very little to chat about of late, unless you want to hear all about the oil change and new brake pads for Matt's car, weighing the pros and cons of many, many, many backpacks and of course running back and forth to the theater.
Pixar’s last film, Cars 2 was their first dud of a movie, so Brave has a lot to prove. This is Pixar’s first film to have a female lead and a princess nonetheless. Brave takes place in the Scottish highlands and stars Merida, a red haired young teenager who wants more adventure in her life. She is quite a shot with a bow and arrow a-la Katniss from The Hunger Games. The animation looks to be beautiful and the story sounds enticing, so we shall see what route Pixar goes with this one.
This year’s Wikimania will take place in July in Washington DC.
Every once in a while, you read a book that’s so wrenching, so gorgeously written that you know that it will stay with you long after you turn the last page.
When creating this piece, I intentionally left this area to be customized by YOU once you receive the 16 x 20 print. Giving you the option to customize the print with your color of choice.
“In Zen it is said that ‘the grand round mirror of wisdom is as black as pitch.’”
Hackers are suspected of taking down banner advertisements on AtomCoupons.com website today. This is the second hack job of AtomCoupons & extended family of sites in as many days. As reported earlier, their Facebook page was compromised this weekend, & today, their Apache served WordPress sitemap was messed up by the vandals
While the boys and I were strolling through Whole Foods this week we hit the jackpot! The So Delicious brand is offering a limited edition coconut milk in an eggnog flavor, just during the holiday season. No dairy, no eggs, no bad stuff at all! There were only four quarts on the shelf, and we got so excited we bought them all :)
Now, I don't usually pay much attention to reviews in selecting my bourbons, but it's always interesting when someone has a very passionate reaction. John Hansell reviewed these bourbons in a post provocatively titled Don't buy this whiskey! He particularly disliked the oat bourbon and had this to say about it:
A few weeks ago I received news that Anna, one of my closest friends, had died very suddenly and unexpectedly. At the moment, no one is sure what happened. It can apparently take 6-8 weeks for autopsy results so we are still waiting. When I saw the message that her husband had posted on Facebook, I was numb. I actually sat there for a few minutes trying to figure out why he would joke about something like this...because clearly, that message had to be a joke. Anna had just celebrated her 30th birthday and her 5th wedding anniversary. She was too young to die.
Our reading last week was To Each Its Own Meaning, a collection of essays each describing a different kind of biblical-text criticism. Some of it – source, historical, form – is basic stuff, parsing out the text to determine how many authors there are, when it was written, what commonalities it shares with other texts within the Bible (or outside of it), etc.
Vino's Pizza Pub And Brewery Rock Hopera Imperial IPA
As long as she stays in this exact spot, he can’t get to her. That is until he starts CUTTING OFF HIS OWN HAND WITH HIS SHIV, desperate to get across that table and kill Jocelyn. Who the fuck is this guy? Is he nuts?? Well, yeah, I guess he is. But this goes beyond “nuts.” It’s like he values killing this woman more than his own life. That can’t be normal, can it? Then, just when it seems like he’s going to succeed, guards race in and save her.
She's not rude, she's just weary of the fame and celebrity tag.
Starting around 1970, I took every mind-altering drug that I could lay my hands on, and by 1972, I was taking full-strength, imported American LSD at least once a week, and smoking extremely large quantities of hashish in every available moment in between trips. This lasted for at least two, more like three years.
13.THE TEARDROP EXPLODES - Reward
(I always find it amusing when food writers refer to the person eating with them as their “companion.” It sounds kind of naughty and clandestine. Like maybe the NY Times food critic takes a call girl out for dinner on the paper’s dime.)
Yesterday, the six-year-old attended the birthday party of one of her friends. So we talked about what we thought the birthday girl would like, combed through the fabric stash for inspiration, and ended up making this little kitty. My daughter designed and stuffed it, while I did the sewing machine and hand finishing grunt work.
One by one, we start to float,
"It’s what I write on Green, how I tell true stories. Obviously with names changed to protect the innocent, guilty and accused! You see mate. The thing about writing a story, be it fact or fiction, truth or dare, is that you can always alter the ending slightly. Simply because everyone has a different way of seeing things! But don't fret, you ain't no Dorothy and I'm no wizard of Oz! I don't like writing about the past at all, but sometimes I do...when it's a good story that might just mean something to me alone!"
Remember our current challenge of Cats and Dogs for Kids is still going on until noon Friday June 17th so pull out your cats and dogs stamps and make a cute kids card. Enter it in our challenge; then if you can, please send your kids cards to SAS4Kids for us to cheer a child inpatient in a Childrens Hospital.
Hope you are all ok.
you don't have ADD.
There's still life after the machine.
That being said, not a bad read. It wasn't meant to be realistic, more of an thought exercise. How much are we willing to give up for intellect? How important is it? Health, taste, skill, life? Do they even attain intellect, or just speed? No answers given, but isn't that true of most dystopian literature?
What is the situation in Germany? A brief survey has revealed that the German Trademark Register has 13 entries (mainly for vodka) including "Lenin". Lenin is beaten by Churchill, who has 28 entries - mainly for cigars, whiskey and gin.
I would look at those different pages
Horizontal philanthropy–a reference to how the poor help each other–is strong across Africa. Indeed there are indications that orphaned children get 90 percent of their support from their community, including their extended families.
Even if people decide to sell their own place, they should still hire a professional real estate lawyer to help them with the paperwork and end sale. A lawyer who knows the ins and outs of real estate can spot any problems or surprises that may impede the sale before they cause disruption.
I’m mostly ranting about frustrations I have on a day where I shouldn’t be dismayed. But understand how hard it can be when I go to church while these questions are roaming through my head with no answer in sight. I suspect I’ll always be plagued by these questions, which I’m sure will give birth to MORE questions that will never be answered. And while it’s disheartening to me on a personal level, I can still relax in the fact that I AM happy with who I am and the life I’ve lived.
If the IRS says no and the Yankees open their wallets, that might answer the question of whether tax-exempt bonds were essential.
But I really never had a bump, which was a little sad for me. I
Robert Reich on the forgotten American worker - the economy is expanding incrementally, but paychecks aren't. Link here
It was not going to be easy for the police to remove anything. Tents, books, food, sleeping areas etc tape up and taped down. If they could have, I think their stuff would have been nailed to the ground.
So eventually, the pain faded and the writing bug hit again. I dove into a new project, Free to a Good Home, in December of 2007. By spring break of 2008, I had outlined the basic story and written the first few chapters, and then I wrote like crazy over the summer to finish the manuscript. I used the lessons I’d learned with my first manuscript to bone up on craft, revise relentlessly, and research the best places to send my manuscript. Rinse, repeat, and more rejection.
“He wants to go to Pop’s, too.”
3 Days Ago
What is your goal for the book, ie: what do you want people to take with them after they finish reading the story?
His name was Lampard
Today, the question is what will blacks do?
Then Angela arrived and took charge of brainstorming ideas for lighting. The challenge was how to create strong shadows without going black and without having too much white glare on the puppets. Putting the light behind the puppets did create the ominous atmosphere. Angela adjusted the cheap Impact lights to the right hight:
Paper - brown, pink
After you’ve answered WHO your participants are and WHERE are they coming from, you can then start thinking about the best area to hold your meeting.
while double dutch b-girls
A Cipher
But, I told Carynn I was gonna answer her questions because I am bar tending in a bar where the only person in it at this moment is myself and I am incredibly bored.. So with out further ado Carynn's questions.
Mind you, the first 2 sections comprise about 4 pages. My friend said she already has 2 pages of notes to discuss regarding these first 4 pages of text. Will keep you posted on this one. I’m also supposed to be 1/2 way through Don Quixote. I’m at about page 250, or a quarter of the way through the book. Will have to step it up on this front.
The school is a fine arts school with a modern building. All colors, not like the institutional schools I remember, with a big green staircase rising past three stories of windows through which you can see the downtown skyline. The classrooms are all open. They have a Mac lab with video and music-editing software.
It scares me mightily that despite these many opportunities for you to get the facts, you don’t have them, and you promote wild and scurrilous claims across the internet. If you don’t know better, that’s your fault. You should know better.
Ali is heartbroken when she hears the news and there is all kinds of ugly crying and such, and Frank leaves, full of ANGST at having to break Ali’s heart. Ali gets her crap together and lets her remaining two men, Chris and Roberto, know that she is there FOR THEM. Because this show is all about finding love, and not about creating famewhores. Right, Bob Guiney? Right, Melissa Rycroft?
So, how did I get The Office?Spin City was cast by Allison Jones.She also casts The Office.She became a fan of mine through a series of auditions.I kept going into her office year after year auditioning for different things.I got some and not others but she kept bringing me back.I developed a relationship with her – not because I met her at a party and we schmoozed – but because I had proven to her over the course of many years that I was a reliable and serious actor capable of providing a consistent body of work.That is what this business is all about – from a real working actors perspective.Allison remembered me when it was time to cast The Office.She called me to audition and I finally got the part.
When asked if they were a believer in Jesus, an acquaintance answered, “Of all the faiths in the world, I guess I would say I align myself mostly with Christianity. But, do I believe Jesus was God? Well, I’m not sure about that.” When her response was explored a bit further, she shared one of the biggest problems she has with believing in Christ. “If He was God, why didn’t He write the gospels? Why didn’t He tell His own story?”
“And Jesus said unto them, Verily I say unto you, That ye which have followed me, in the regeneration when the son of man shall sit in the throne of his glory, ye also shall sit upon twelve thrones, judging the twelve tribes of Israel.”
I give Karla May, um, props, for not fleeing the house in terror but trying to solve the problem, including tracking down the phone number for our alarm system and giving them the "secret word" (which I had given her but PROMISED THAT SHE WOULD NOT HAVE TO USE), and leaving several messages on my cell phone, which was, as usual, turned to mute and stuck in the bottom of my purse.
Each one is filled with crushed walnut shells (available at pet stores because it's real use is lizard litter) and can be used as a pincushion or a paperweight because the shells make it heavy. LOL! We all seemed to have something to share with each other, plus "show and tell and also.........the celebration of two birthdays!
b. Not amused
We're the last in line
I need some zingy colours in my life right now so I have chosen to use these fab Bo bunny papers which I have had for a while now. My flowers and lace are from WOC, my ribbon, pearls and button are from stash. My bakers twine I got from Sarah's and my sentiment is waltzingmouse.
His lanky stature and handsome face won him many fans and he was reveled as a teen idol during the 60s.
Portable food - green chile chicken empanadas - crockpot cream cheese chicken with a can of chopped green chiles and Monterey jack cheese added. I use canned crescent rolls, add the chicken filling, fold over and seal with a fork. Brush with butter, sprinkle with taco seasoniing and bake according to can directions.
****There is a link here to Final Fantasy VII
Now...spokesperson Stacey Witalec is quoted in the piece saying that it's normal to destroy electronic copies, it's to maintain the integrity of the original; no bits and pieces floating around. As an old records management type, I can understand that. But...hard copy? That's damage control, and when you do damage control before something even goes public? DING DING DING DING! That's a serious red flag. Hope the upcoming AG audit on the wine kiosks knows about this.
The holiness of God not reverenced.
“SHUT UP!!” Said her father angrily while he’s still hitting Sooyoung.
It is a performance based poll and therefore other polls, especially ones that started in the pre-season have no bearing on this.
In MY opinion this man is sick and badly in need of psychological help as are all the others who do things like he did. There is NOTHING normal about any human being having sex with an animal. It goes against EVERYTHING imaginable! It goes against NATURE and the NATURAL ORDER of things! It is nothing short of blatant PERVERSION! I’ve known people in mental institutions locked away because they had sex with horses and dogs and believe me they are SICK SICK SICK and CRAZY CRAZY CRAZY! This guy amazes me simply by coming out and telling the world that he had sex with a dolphin and he seems varily proud of it. Where is his SHAME? And need I ask if there was any OFFSPRING from this union? OMG that is SICK! If any of you see Dolphin Woman running around in the everglades of Florida then you know where she came from and who her parents are, no?
PS- Thank you to my lovely husband who is always supportive and amazing,
Admittedly, I was tempted. When a woman hasn’t had "pizza" in a long, long time, she craves it. I’m not talking about anchovies, peppers, or any extra spice. No pepperonis either. Just the basic spread topped with sausage, and I’d be satisfied. Very satisfied.
Anyway wanna hear a bit of notoriety with Fregosi and Ryan? Fregosi ended up retiring and becoming manager for the Angels in the late ‘70s. Guess who was his ace? You guessed it: Lynn Nolan Ryan.
My first couple of choices were beased on the recommendations of some pals who had beaten me to trying them first. Two beers kept being mentioned in despatches as really nice beers and well worth trying. These were Harviestoun's Wild Hop IPA and Wye Valley Brewery's Wye Not.
Here we found ourselves. Two weeks before opening night. About to plunge into an intense string of daily tech and dress rehearsals – full runs almost every night. If you had been following our blog at all, you could tell that excitement was mounting.
Those are just a starter, and truth be told, actually these ones more amuse me than annoy me. They are (drum roll), the “as seen on tv” commercials, where everything goes black and white. Take this one for chef basket:
One cop stayed with the male so he couldn't leap handcuffed into the river (that would be a bitch of a report to have to write) and the two sergeants and I assisted in securing and gaining control of the female.
I ‘m feeling okay, I went to the doctors Monday and I have good ole Bronchitis, so I’m on some meds to hopefully clear things up and get better, we leave for Cabo, Mexico on the 26th, our anniversary and I want to be better so I’m taking care of myself. The doctor said to rest, yeah right!
We have got to stop expecting outside sources to take care of us and learn how to be self reliant. It seems we are a society full of co-dependant people and what we really need is interdependence (people who can take care of themselves and can contribute). People need to be able to take care of themselves and their families and sadly we are moving further and further away from that. Overall, we are no longer able to provide the basic needs if our life depended on it.
I’m pretty naive when It comes to the business side of everything…or maybe not naive..I let it go over my head is more like it. It sucks the life out of me..business, that is.
Overall, there's no way that ebooks would ever completely replace real printed books for me. Let's face it, if I read an ebook I love, I'm going to need to purchase a printed copy for my shelf. I love books, and I love book covers, and an ebook just doesn't have the same charm. Then there's the fact that the review copies I'm offered are generally in printed form - although having a Kindle has tempted me to give NetGalley another try.
“Fair play to you both,” I said.
Now listen to Dave Stewart. He laughs when John of Staten Island calls the ANC government a bunch of communists. He then says South Africa isn’t run by communists. NewsGuy then mentions the ANC tripartite alliance with the South African Communist Party (and COSATU). Now Stewart suddenly changes his tune. His FW de Klerk foundation now suddenly wrote articles to warn South Africans of this threat. The same threat which didn’t exist 15 seconds ago.
Once upon a time, I was walking across the fairgrounds at Jenny Brook Bluegrass Festival. It was late in the fest and a maple glazed doughnut and some aspirin was about all I was up for. Then I heard it: a woman’s voice wafting across the field, singing some bluegrass standard in a way that I had only heard on old recordings. You could say that she was belting it out, except her singing had as much color and warmth as it had raw power. I found myself galloping past the concession stands. When I got to where I could see the stage, I discovered Hot Mustard, a group from the frozen north (its members live in New Hampshire and Vermont).
Martin of Fire Broadside has done a splendid job painting these up in an ominous, businesslike fashion, and he took it upon himself to array the pieces together to show the kind of look the gamer can achieve.
Cylinder takes what would normally be a predictable setup, throws a twist into it, then takes what would normally be a sloppy execution, and crafts a set of sequences that keep us engaged the entire time. I can’t stress how often these kinds of scripts devolve into a repetitive sloppy narrative. But Romero has carefully plotted out each sequence so that the chaos has form, so that there’s a method to the madness. The result is a confident story that always knows where it’s going.
In an homage blatant copying of Chris at Thinly Spread, I bring you our favorite weekend Autumn Walk. Now I am pretty lucky in the once the boys get started on a walk they love them and often it is MadDad and I who start back first.
You can also add frozen peas instead of the green beans, but they should be layered on top in the last 5 minutes of the original 15 minute simmer or they will get mushy. If you want to stretch this dish to feed more, you can add a can of corn (well-drained, of course).
She leans into him, always.
“I don’t have a date Dada! And either way, the closing is just meant for the rich ones to bring their dates on the valentines day.”
It is the nature of Jesus’ teaching that the bar He raises is higher than our grasp. But in the reaching, we reach higher all the time.
So next time you fly into Heathrow and your plane is making its final descent, wave hello!
First, lets start with Sam Adams Noble Pils. Apparently there is a real media blitz by SA for this beer. I have seen nada on advertising for it myself. Maybe that is because I live here in New England and SA doesn’t really need to do much selling up here. But, I had some at a pub a few weeks ago and thought it was decent but wanted to try some more. Well, my wife picked me up a bomber of it the other day and I had it this past weekend. I decided I really liked it! It seemed nicely hopped and good bitterness to it. Gets better the more you drink as well. I would give it a 4 on the 1-5 scale.
Eduardo repeated in surprise: “Thiago?”
Not only is this a Block of the Month but it is also kind of a Quilt Along. At the end of the 12 months you'll have a sampler quilt top! And the great thing is everyone's will look different, it's going to be awesome!
Most detainees are entitled to receive visitors at all ICE facilities. If you decide to visit the detention center or you want to bring something to your friend, call ahead to see if there are any visiting restrictions or what kind of items you can bring. Usually food and even some books are not allowed.
and of course the menagerie.
For a bit of fun, here are some facts from today, May 6 (it’s May 6 when I write this, not when it’s scheduled to publish…but then it’s always tomorrow here in Australia):
Q: Tell us about depth of language. How can you teach that? How can a writer improve this skill?
Transfer the fresh almonds and fresh chillies into sterilised jars. (I sterilise my jars by washing them thoroughly and then letting them sit in boiling water for a couple of minutes.)
I am happy to report that, despite a trip to South Africa (Cape Town for the weekend! – which is always quite dangerous on the culinary front) in between, I have not cheated, I have exercised at least every second day for an hour or so, and
So, anyone want to join me?
If you think you have, or if you think a friend may have bulimia nervosa, you should talk to you health care provider.
It was a great night, and I had so much fun sitting around, chatting, crafting, and spending time with my friends. It was exactly what I needed last night. Thanks ladies!
Hickory Chair and Brooklyn-based company, Hable Construction developed a collaboration leading to some unique chair designs. The designs are simply beautiful, inspired by watercolors and hand-drawn illustrations.
Housing
There are two ways of looking at What went wrong with Intute, then. The first way is to say that nothing went wrong, and that it was bound to fold sooner or later; and the second one is to say that, had it developed in a different way, it might have become a vital service for students and academics, and therefore what went wrong was that it didn’t develop in the correct way.
Wheel gymnastics has become somewhat more popular in recent times, several clubs have seen an enormous growth in members and there is a lot of new talent on the way. Even though todays competition included absolute beginners, I noticed several participants who might develop well in the next few years. Very nice to see...
He stepped back from her, unwilling to engage.
While in older homes, there might not be this kind of diagram. It would be in your best interest to make one for future references. Once the power is off, the Duncan electrician removes the cover and unscrews the mounting screws, just the mountings and not any of the wires yet. Then the electrical outlet are pulled from the wall and compared to the one the Duncan electrician is going to replace it with; they carefully place which wire goes where and place the wires on the new one as such.
The skinny, tall Wookie suited blob that I have dubbed “Laurel” carries a long Ghillie material wrapped object that from its general size and shape, I am almost certain is a long barreled military bolt action sniper rifle with scope and suppressor. His companion “Hardy” carries a similarly wrapped but much shorter blob that is probably an M4 judging by its size.
See, book finales are just as epic as this one. But is this one a good finale for the Bone saga? Perhaps, issues aside. Despite being the longest Bone book, it took me the shortest period of time to read it: less than 2 days. It also has a lot of trouble keeping transitions and scenarios fluid from switch to switch; so you could be reading about Fone Bone and Thorn’s trek to the dragon grounds, and then clumsily switch to the scenario of the village warfare. The fluidity level of this book is, on a scale from “god tier” to “fail tier”, ranks at about a “lame tier”. That’s next-to-worst. But besides this, the book also has trouble keeping sequences fresh out of the oven, and instead lets them rot a bit. Like Hugo Cabret, this book tells more through pictures than words, and that’s not entirely a good thing, unlike in Hugo. Set this aside, and Crown of Horns actually isn’t half bad. It doesn’t strike gold on all its factors, but more like silver: humor, violence, emotion, entertainment, and the like. It’s got all the things a big-kid book finale needs: violence, role models, humor, and drama. Now let’s see how this all adds up on the chart.
During these fast-paced times, the function of a wristwatch is obsolete. If you really desire to look rich and successful, maybe you should consider buying a replica watch. As a status symbol, no one really pays much attention to your watch, as long as they see one that looks expensive.
Eventually the sun began to relent as I approached Tarikere. It was too big a town to sleep in. I had the vision of a small house, or a school, on the outskirts of a village, surrounded by fields, where I could put up for the night. As I entered the town, weaving through the main road traffic, the dull ache in the nape that had been pestering me on and off gave a sharp twang and almost in the same instant I saw a fresh juice shop and coasted to a stop in front of it. It was the best chickoo milkshake ever; thick, chilled, not too sweet; two for 40 bucks; totally worth it. It was 5:30pm and I had come about 240k. Bhadravati was another 20k, I could maybe cross Bhadravati and find a place to sleep. I checked the bike once and all seemed well.
Steven had been fighting an ITB issue the entire time on training. Unfortunately, it decided to flare up on him a little after mile 12. We said our good byes and I wished him good luck. I crossed the interstate and turned the music up. It was time to focus on maintaining the pace I set out to maintain. As soon though as we separated, I swear the heat climbed by 30 degrees. It was so stinking hot at this point I roll up my sleeves and try to focus on passing people ahead of me since people started slowing down around me. At this point I am still feeling pretty good, but I needed fluids I could tell.
(especially off sides,
A First Edition deluxe size Optimus Prime is available in a special Matrix of Leadership box. This was released for the 2011 SDCC. Another deluxe Prime comes in an Entertainment Pack with Megatron, the kids from the cartoon and a DVD. Unfortunately, I don’t think this was ever mass released. The Cyberverse Commander Optimus Prime is a nice little toy. Its truck and robot modes are very good for that size toy. It has cartoon accurate dual guns, though oversized and clear blue. The mini DVD that it comes with contains the episode “Masters and students”, the same episode all the other Cyberverse Commanders come with. But it is a good episode.
OMG, I had Deon in my PC on Wednesday night trying to see if it's my network card that might be giving me problems with my connections... mmmm, lets just say this girl nearly pooped her brooks when my PC wouldn't work properly after he had been inside the poor thing.. But hat's off to Dee ( well ok he was shit scared NOT TOO- BWHAHAH) he sat up till the early hours and got my PC back to what it was.. but still no solid connections. lol. Hopefully this weekend they can play.. but my "baby" was needed this week.... WHEEEEEEE, I have a brand new kit out today!
“To me, it summed up the hypocrisy of the whole city experience, and I despaired of ever finding a man to settle down with.”
This is music from an era when guitars were sex and, in the Seventies, no guitar was sexier than that of Mick Ronson.
Zukini -1
Sailfish, yes Sailfish are now taking bait as well and are in the Marietta Island and El Morro Area. There was even a Sailfish hook-up on Guanatuna II yesterday, but Capt. Juan and the boys lost it because nobody expected to have a hundred pound fish on light line! The Bait is still plentiful, so if you know what is going on, tell me please.
Why do we believe that when we read God's word that we only 100% understand it?
Die Internetverwaltung Icann soll ab 2009 unabhängig von der US-Regierung arbeiten. Die EU-Kommission zeigte sich erfreut über den Rückzug des US-Staats — und will die Icann dabei unterstützen.
This is the third and last drawing in this trilogy.
I can only imagine thousands of battle-weary farmer Johns, storming the valley with long-barreled muskets to sack Fort Hoohah. The unsuspecting natives are overrun 13 ways to Sunday and sent packing with just their loincloths, and suddenly Captain Flora's plucky pioneers have infiltrated the countryside, erecting little log cabins and rowing and hoeing a flourishing cotton crop. Say, how many settlers you think can fit into one vagina anyway, pilgrim?
Getting or Giving Presents: Giving, without a doubt, I LOVE giving presents
And Hezekiah rejoiced, and all the people, that God had prepared the people: for the thing was done suddenly. 2 Chronicles 29:36 (KJV)
Some little warmth for pleasure,
The Founding Fathers believed that only men of “virtue” could lead America and only citizens who practiced virtue in their lives could preserve and protect the republic. They were right.
When I met Dr Pruthi I had been cooking for nearly 10 years and all I had learnt was ‘when’ to add the spices but never ‘how’ and certainly never ‘why’!!
09 As Long As We're Together
Tossed with bamboo shoots, shallots and sliced red chilli, this was ideal with a bowl of steamed rice.
In 1852 the brewery the Central Agriculture School moved to Weihenstephan and all the brewing students came with it. In 1895 the school became an Academy and in 1919 was elevated to a University. It became incorporated into the Technical University of Munich in 1930 and soon developed into the world centre for brewing and brew technology.
Bring a small pot of water to a boil, and add the beets. Cook until a fork can easily pierce the beets. Remove from the water and let cool. Use a spoon to remove the skin (we sliced ours in half first for the photo). Chop into bite sized pieces. In a bowl, combine dill, carrot tops, onion, garlic and yogurt. Add the beets and stir to coat the beets with dressing. Chill for 30 minutes to let the flavors combine. Salt and pepper to taste.
The Gender Recognition Act brought Britain into line with a ruling by the European Court of Rights which legitimises the preposterous idea that a transsexual can retrospectively say that their gender at birth was what they now say it is. What this contortion of logic means is that they were not born what they were born but what they now say they were born.
Are you a student looking to work in the marketing and advertising industries? Do you want to know what working in the exciting world of digital is all about? Then come and join us for Internet Advertising Bureau’s exclusive event at The University of Manchester on:
The seventh book was a blast to read. The youngest was an original from the rest of her siblings and she was not afraid to go out in public and declare it.
On a more serious note, I only hope that all affected Thai people recover quickly from these disastrous floods. I also hope that the more than one million affected Cambodians get back on their feet soon too.
Today is International Women’s Day.
“Go poo-pees.”
I die longing
Last night, we think largely due to the rain, there were three men and two women (Linette and I) in the Beginner 2 class at Salsa Heat. It was a great opportunity for us. Everyone had been in this level before, and we only needed to briefly review Dile Que No, which is retaught at the beginning of each and every Beginner 2 class, without having to spend over half the class going over the basics. I think Dile Que No is retaught each time because it is so integral to the transition of the next dance move-- couples can always come together and Dile Que No after every move. So, we Dile Que No'ed, we practiced Check and Vuelta, and then Sombrero.
We are really excited to be doing this again and we look forward to trying to give you podcasts on a regular basis. I doubt it will be weekly, but maybe every couple of weeks or so. Make sure you let all of your Lostie friends know we are back and that they should subscribe again if they un-subscribed.
Bachmann, along with Governor Bob McDonnell went on the campaign trail with Mitt Romney in Virginia yesterday, of course there was the usual speculation as to which former candidate or Governor, might be in consideration for the V.P. slot, (Politico) however, as history tells us, no-one is going to be aware of who Mitt Romney will choose as his second. In Romney’s case, as a businessman and former Governor, he will look towards capabilities, as well as the political opportunity a particular V.P. candidate might bring to the table. Therefore, it’s anyone’s guess, and speculation is rampant with every single high profile Republican who has endorsed Romney – from Senator Rubio in Florida, to Nikki Haley in South Carolina.
a beautiful lemon mistake. And then his footprints,
And I’m going to foist pictures on you, because I know that looking at someone else’s ultrasound pictures is almost as exciting as looking at someone else’s vacation slides!
“For us to have development in Kuala Lumpur, efficient public transport necessary; it’s not a choice… the only way forward is MRT.
Being the self-proclaimed cheapskate that I am, I was blessed to be able to borrow some maternity clothes from my best friend, and the rest I got used from a local consignment store. I HATE (I could repeat that several times for emphasis) maternity clothes and was not keen on spending money on something I would only wear for a short period of time and that I really disliked.
DP: Autumn Splendor: We R Memory Keepers and Forever Fall: BoBunny
Apply WSL Mask 84 or mask of your choice, Layers, Merge, Merge Group
But as applause broke and the bride descended a metal ladder in her camouflage print wedding gown, a symphony of motors cheered the union.
“These strains and slippages in funds lent to the infrastructure sector have been caused by project execution milestones being missed due to problems in fuel linkages and clearances.
ever had
Jesus Christ loves me! Amen!
Nkrumah prophetically described the many variants of the new colonialism, but placed the primacy of economic penetration as the “normal” and central method whereby the old colonial powers retain control over the former colonies.
"Tell us more about this arse 360 thing old whippet".
The rain dance hasn’t worked so far, still no rain. So, I dumped the end of a bag of potato chips out on my balcony for the birds, that usually brings the rain.
Hubby (looking a little scared): Why?
His laws of thermodynamics teach this lesson. He is a conservative God he wastes nothing but turns it to something else to bless us. Water will turn to ice if subjected to the right condition and it will turn to steam, etc. It is not wasted. Sufferings are used by God to bless us somehow. He is a wise and faithful loving God. He deserves to be trusted simply for his amazing creative mind.
All of my works fall into either the categories of absurd comedy, or darkly emotional.
I told her I'd think about it.
Don’t worry you ain’t yet gonna die
From the midnight sun where the hot springs blow.
Overtime it is. Five minutes or sudden death.The toss is to our advantage, Thunder have the wind behind and the slight slope to speed the ball.
be fictional, I abase myself in advance). But I love the gods’ habit of competing for mortal adoration, and
holds. . . Watchmen walk slow from floor to floor
I've been a registered Independent from my first voter registration filing. I was initially taught that as a voter I should look at the individual and his/her stand on issues--regardless of party affiliation. I learned that there were good people in both parties and it was best to vote my conscience and align my vote with those whom most closely feel like I do on any particular subject. I have bought into that ideal from the beginning.
Gone with the Wind by Margaret Mitchell . I have never really seen this movie. I'm sure it's been on while I've been in the room, but I've never been a fan. I read this book in the car (while Terry drove) driving to Yellowstone National Park. It struck me as a masterpiece. That was over ten years ago. I should maybe read it again, as well.
· One word to describe Luke is……
It. Is. Driving. Me. Crazy.! I'm so tired that the bags under my eyes have bags. I woke up my oldest today and THOUGHT he got up. I then went back to bed for what I thought was an hour until 7, but it turned out to be ..um 10am..yep great parenting! So I get the younger ones up and we head downstairs to find that the alarm is still on and deadbolt locked..so Ryan didn't get up either..FABULOUS!!!
Precise?
Yes, there is the discussion of things like who will care for your children if you are not able to, how you want them cared for, what you expect them to have access to and what resources are most important. But there are many more facets to the process.
A group of Japanese publishers have come up with their own digital distribution plans for North America. 37 publishers, including ASCII Media Works, Kadokawa Shoten, Kodansha, and Shogakukan, are planning to collaborate on a joint portal site. It is tentatively called the J Manga Portal Site and will act as the distribution point of manga from the 37 publishers. According to the Japanese industry news site animeanime.biz, the portal site will also distribute some free manga as well.
I know there’s danger in mixing Ghostbusters and Rocky IV, and even more danger in comparing UCLA football to Ivan Drago and implying that USC is an underdog. Which USC is not. But if I didn’t do any of that it would mean that statistical analysis would be needed, and no one wants that. Anyway, to sum it up…
Welcome to a special blog hop we are calling, Karing for Karen!!
Before Valentine’s Day, there was also strong objection to its celebration.
The interview was almost as unsatisfying, but I won't go into detail, except that it was for a part-time post that only lasts until March 2012, which has both benefits and drawbacks. And obviously I don't know if I will be offered it, and if I am, whether I will accept. I am looking forward to the other interview in a couple of weeks, and still have three 'live' applications and another suitable vacancy to apply for today. So I'd better get on with that.
We were led to a booth and then the vodka arrived. Much bonhomie followed as we chatted the evening away, or rather shouted over the music! At last the time for the switch-off arrived and we set up the cameras ready to capture both picture and video. As we made the final preparations we looked up to see the lights had already gone off. Someone had obviously not read the script! or forgotten to feed the meter!
* Purdue University - West Lafayette (USA)
Coupled with that is a need to relax - no I do honestly - not completely mad/workaholic. Because we have such busy weekends from plot work, family visits and outings then sitting reading the papers with a coffee will only be squished in for an hour or two at most. I've worked out that I must have an afternoon in the week of feet up rest. Not doing something off the list. Invariably I potter or quietly sew or read with the radio on and a cup of tea but crucially I give myself permission to do plenty of 'nuffinks' as my dear friend Henry would put it. It boosts my immune system too - if I don't get sufficient rest I get the next narsty cold/flu going. Proven.
You are lost
(If you’ll allow me a tangent, and an out of context comparison, consider Kosovel’s ‘four Zeta’, and his sense of Europe absolutely being at an end in the early ’20s (which we’ll get on to some time), and then O’Hara’s ‘casually ask for a carton of Gauloises and a carton / of Picayunes’ in 1959. This isn’t fair to O’Hara – it’s perfectly reasonable to pick up a couple of packets of cigarettes (even fancy foreign ones) – and it’s a crude contrast, but since we’re here… Its nicely suggestive of the place and period that J.M Ledgard’s describes as ‘the high-water mark of abundance on the planet, the maximum moment, of consumption without a sense of an ending.’ Ledgard is writing specifically about Princeton in 1949, but I think New York in the period between the end of the Second World War and the Cuban Missile Crisis can fall into the same bracket.)
In summary, this looks once again like applying First World principles and policies with African precision.
What about if you grow up in a bad place,
Lake Tahoe is my happy place, it is one place were I can truly relax & soak in the beauty around me. And, I read ALL 3 Hunger Games Books while I was gone. SO good!!! I couldn't put them down. Can't wait to see the movie!
The original site is linked there, but I've lifted a copy to my site. It's been there for two years now (and is still there) but my readership doesn't need to provide advertising revenue for a general homeschooling site.
I’ve had three jobs in New York so far. Right now I work for an Austrian company in Midtown: In the Empire State Building. Yeah – it IS actually pretty awesome to be greeted by guards every day but in the end, a job is just a job, no matter where you work. Before this, I was employed by a non-for-profit organization on the other side of Midtown. I was working there for an hourly pay and I had never been as poor as during that one year I was employed with them. My very first job was a two month stint as a waitress in the Lower East Side. After figuring that this was indeed not what I had come to New York for, I decided to look for more serious employment (which I eventually found).
7 months, 8 months, 9 months, 10 months. 11 months. 1 year!
If something is getting that much attention, it's probably worth an hour of my time to give it a look so I asked Nanci if I could borrow her copy. I read several chapters and I have to admit, I'm not getting it. To be honest, if it had come in via our slush pile, I would have passed on it without requesting a full. I didn't connect with the characters or find myself enmeshed in the writing. Now granted, this genre is not my bailiwick so that's going to be a factor.
Today I am highlighting the work of Christine Mingus. Check out her project entitled Playing With Patterns. You'll find kindergarten resources for at least 10 different station activities, all complete with downloads.
56. Lee Oskar - Why Can't We Be Friends (3:49)
Rating: 9 / 10
Well I started my new job on the 1st. They have crazy training, but I should be finished and able to start actually working the 12th or the 15th. But really I would rather have excess training than not enough like at my last job.
Clip for Rafskinna DVD Magazine # 2 (House)
Well enough about me, I'm sure you're here for the eye candy I've made. This week the Designed 2 Delight DT's Challenge is to use BLING. I think this is an easy challenge. I hope you have a chance to join us this week!
Dogfish Head Old School Barleywine
Field Trip - Give Me a Break
Altitude
Jogging up the aisle, Addison’s hair flew behind her gracefully, her breath coming out in quick bursts. In her nervous state she almost tripped going up the few stairs that led to the altar. She quickly recovered from her clumsiness and made it to Father James’ side. Motioning towards the table in quick hand motions, he seemed to be as nervous as she was. Addison obeyed him, laying down on the table and watching his actions with nervous eyes.
Chinos.
Mary.
where is the appropriate place to stay if I got a job offer in Penang. I must plan ahead to ensure that both myself and Princess will not stay in street. I have an aunt who resides in Penang, of course I can actually stay with her, but being me, I don't think I fancy that idea. I rather have a place of my own.
Catholics who have little or no experience of the Latin Mass, Mass in the Extraordinary Form, have many pre-conceived notions.
PK-642 Boy Mates Assortment
Police in the southwest Ohio town of Franklin say a woman handed a note to a teller in a Huntington Bank branch Friday and made off with an undisclosed amount of money.
-”I feel I’m with him at all times and everywhere.”
There might not be a state that betters symbolizes the fundamental shift that's occurred in the Republican Presidential race over the last few months than South Carolina. When PPP last polled there in early June, Mitt Romney led everyone in the field by at least 15 points. But now with Rick Perry's entry Romney has lost almost half of his support. That leaves Perry with a 20 point lead- he's at 36% to 16% for Romney, 13% for Michele Bachmann, 9% for Herman Cain, 8% for Newt Gingrich, 5% for Ron Paul, 4% for Rick Santorum, and 2% for Jon Huntsman.
all those years ago?
Although my weight numbers have not changed, something else has!!! I have a scale that measures my % of body fat and % of muscle (among other things.) Much to my surprise as I weighed in this week, I am now the proud owner of MORE MUSCLE than FAT! WOOO HOOOO! My fat is 28.5% and my muscle is 29.7%!!!!
In a region where older ladies (by that, I mean old enough to be married and wear a sari, which is about sixteen) are obliged to cover their mouths and shy away from the camera, these young ladies looked boldly into my lens with confident smiles.
An hour later remove, brush with BBQ sauce and serve the juicy BBQ chicken with extra BBQ sauce.
I walked towards him though, and sat beside him.
It is time to speak your truth.
Today is April 24th, the day Armenians all over the world commemorate the deaths of the estimated 900,000 to 1.5 million Armenians planned and ordered at the highest levels of the Turkish government and carried out by direct executions, enslavement and kidnapping, forced relocations into the desert and deliberate starvation.*
image circa 1981
Inside the garden, fruit trees are an attractive feature and there is always the possibility of gathering fruit in season. It can be a miracle how the once lifeless winter twigs are converted in the spring into clouds of blossom ready to turn into fruit later on.
On the third color, I wrote places:
I started writing my first novel, Diary of Bedlam, in June 2008, the summer I turned 40. I don’t remember thinking “I’m gonna be 40, life is passing me by, I gotta write a novel NOW.” I’d simply reached a point where I was ready. Good thing, too, because if I’d have known then it was going to take me nearly four years to write a novel (and still not be published), I might never have started.
Globally, gaming is big business, with a market worth an estimated $50 billion (£30bn) in 2011 and a demographically diverse audience with an even gender split. But it’s not just about numbers: the dedication of gamers to the pleasure of play means time spent at the console can exceed that spent with a feature film or novel.
Recommended for those who like to blend dramatic themes and admirable performances with highly entertaining, often hilarious crack; bonus for yakuza-lite fans.
Since it is March and it is St. Patricks Day soon, I decided to use my very much beloved, but little used "Irish Blessings" stamp set for my card, this week :)
Distinction between ‘professional’ and other content
The Doomsdayers have nothing left to say
The post-season has started in the Midwest and what a race at Nike Midwest! York, who after finishing 3rd at the IL state meet stepped up big to win the Nike Midwest title over Neuqua Valley. Loyola, as recently as 2 weeks ago was ranked #1 in the US, was left out. Loyola's chances of an at-large bid however, should be very favorable when considering their 3 wins over York this season. York will be running in their 6th consecutive National meet , the only program to have qualified for every Nike Cross Nationals final. They won in 04 and were runner-ups in 05 and 08. Neuqua Valley won the title in 07 as Illinois has been extremely competitive at this meet.
The reason they probably won’t vote no in the referendum which is due to be held on the 31st May, is that if they do opt out, as Britain and the Czech Republic has already done, they won’t be entitled to any of the bail-out money themselves.
I used a regular sweet roll dough from the book 'The Bread Baker's Apprentice'. It was a very soft dough and I knew it wasn't going to stand up to filling and rolling so I flattened pieces of dough and put them in muffin tins and put the coconut strings in the middle. After pulling the dough over the filling, I added come crumb topping. They came out great.
3) Using a small petal shaped cutter, cut out your shapes. You can find cutters in the polymer clay section at the craft store, but check things out the baking section too because there's always loads more fun shapes there.
I doubt it, too. (In fact, I wonder if Georgia tests many of its other student-athletes the week after spring break.)
Pretty nice for a Monday in February.
A weapon is a possibility. I wouldn’t invest at lower levels, where you might out grow it fast.
According to the CBO's forecast from 2000, the US should currently have a net surplus of $2.5T. It illustrates how much of a sham the government's deficit projections are, particularly as they apply to further out years. (And yes, I realize that 9/11 skews the results, but not nearly to the extent of the miss.)
The lecture is a fascinating, complex and inspiring piece about the state of the planet which is perhaps even more relevant now than when it was first presented. Written in the form of mesostic poem it can be be streamed at Internet Archive.Org.and it is best heard in its entirety (about 30 minutes) rather than summarised here.
Last week, Clayton Cramer posted a piece about the Beslan terrorist attack, in which he noted that the personal testimonies of the victims that some of the hostages were raped, seemed to have been scrubbed from official records, and regional reportage of the incident; and that Wikipedia had a pretty transparent apologia over the incident (go read the linked piece for the full context, I'd have to excerpt the whole thing to make sense here) quoted here:
As we share our laugh, Jimi Hendrix walks by laughing -
The funniest thing I’ve discovered is the differences between heroes and heroines. For instance, when I write an anti-hero (either a guy with a bad attitude or a full on bad boy), people generally accept him, find his flaws amusing, and cheer on his redemption. Anti-heroines, on the other hand, get rejected as “annoying.” :P I’ve noticed this both with my fiction and several well established authors. Heroines are generally judged harder than heroes. So, I try to stick to more sympathetic female leads.
After the movies we hit the street to take in all of the lights my favorite xmas tradition!
There are probably a few contenders for this one. I tend to like books that other people don’t, but I try not to get too embarrassed because I figure everyone has different tastes and so what if they’re not the same. It doesn’t make me any less intelligent just because I like a bit of fluff every now and then. Plus, the world would be boring if we all liked the same thing.
For years I listened to people go on and on about how beneficial my writing about being a care-giver was. All the praise, the sharing, the requests to write more, to collect my writings into a book. The final result has been for Her Final Year to sell a grand total of 32 copies, after years of work and months of flogging the book. What a staggering success.
Once upon a time, I used
I am just popping in to let you know that the mother of all Blog Hops has officially started! Today is the day one! Youhuuu! If you haven't yet seen the beautiful creations that are shared today using There She Goes Clear Stamps, than you should really get started! You can start your hop here.
There are a few family days during the year and hopefully some of them are the reasons for families forgetting about anger and fear and getting together and remembering that they are a family.
My BFF and I planned this one, which we both looked forward to all week.
CESSON-SEVIGNE 35510
how much of the N13 billion
They (sometimes) listen to your side of the argument, but will stop arguing once they’ve proved their point, or once they’re tired of saying the same things over and over to what appears to be a deaf guy with Tourette’s. Side effects of talking to them include, but are not limited to – frayed tempers, and hoarse voices.
What are examples of countries or city tourism offices using social media to answer questions?
The majority of men on board were very wicked. Many were murderers, prisoners heading for the Roman arenas as gladiators or worse. Many were sailors and such men are known for their wicked manners of life. Why would God want to spare them for, according to John 3:18, they were “condemned already?”
When we got the full menus, my heart nearly stopped when I saw a cocktail with TRUFFLE along with all kinds of market fresh sounding deliciousness in it: Pinzimonio ($18) jacopo poli grappa, fresh tomato, fresh orange, olive oil foam, fresh pepper, hangar one vodka, cucumber water, fresh basil, white truffle powder.
What we did spend some time discussing was the requirements of the DWP to know about this particular problem, in black and white, preferably in triplicate. Not only do the DWP need to know what the problem is, but they also need to know that there is no medicine or surgery which can help it, and that its not going to get better. Hopefully it will improve, but with EDS there isn't an actual 'better' point and improvements tend to fluctuate over time back to not improvements. Dr Breathe is going to explain everything in a letter for my GP and rheumatologist so will include the DWP details and send me a copy to keep it on file for the next time my benefits are looked at.
Six members of a loose-knit demonstration led by the Mother's Day Coalition for Peace have been charged with trespassing after trying to enter Wescam's North Service Road offices.
After we did our 180 degree turn into Creek Road, we passed the first ambulance.
Not trying to be profound here… just a few observations based on my 45 years of life here on earth.
The figure was latched on to by conservationists as proof that the bags were killers. For four years the “typo” remained uncorrected. It was only in 2006 that the authors altered the report, replacing “plastic bags” with “plastic debris”. But they admitted: “The actual numbers of animals killed annually by plastic bag litter is nearly impossible to determine.”
3. In the introduction to this commentary you claim to approach Hebrews not as a “laboratory specimen” but as a living word for Christians today. Can you elaborate on this?
This makes enough to serve 6, but you can always keep leftovers in the fridge to reheat during the week!
They'll shed those diapers and lose the scattering, then learn about raising their hands, making rules, laying a foundation for the community they began to build with that first "Hey." They'll make another orca whale painting, another pendulum painting, have another spin of the wheel.
but trying all the same, and that is what its all about right?
So Mr. Riordan actually has a new book out today! The Serpent’s Shadow is another in his Kane Chronicles and I’m happily going to pick it up at the bookstore!
“That’s all down to the narrator, I think,” says McKinty. “If you can get a good narrator, you’re in like Flynn. I’ve been fortunate with Gerard Doyle, who is incredibly popular and much sought after. I’m pretty sure if I’d done a Le Carré or a Douglas Adams and narrated the books myself, it would have been a complete disaster.”
With an ‘unwind’ period in place, the market could adjust appropriately by making sure their ‘ducks are in a row’. For instance, previous contracts agreed upon (often times, not said out right) will include a clause that reads to the effect, “Contract will be denominated in Federal Reserve Notes“. Contracts will need to be upheld regardless because it has gone on for so long without saying. Combine this with allowing competing currencies and new contracts would be drawn up between private parties in whatever form of ‘currency’ they agree to. The point is that they could or could not agree to Federal Reserve Notes. They could denominate their own exchange however they wished.
Horseradish
It’s been common knowledge that Samsung has been long working on a display that can flex, while still providing content on an AMOLED screen. The key material contrast between Youm and normal displays is the use of film instead of glass. This allows for the screen to be extremely thin, and provides it the ability to bend. Samsung claims Youm is lighter, thinner, and, most interestingly, unbreakable. This may lead to a drastic decrease in broken phones should this come to market. Speaking of coming to market, Samsung is looking to bring this futuristic technology to the present: availability is set for the latter part of this year.
If your are easily offended, please comment with those offences and i will try my best to make you laugh instead of be angry, through understanding and, well, love.
Brilliant as the sun.
Angela Ihegbro told The Sun newspaper: “Nmachi’s colour doesn’t matter. She’s a miracle baby. But still, what on earth happened here?”
I need to allow myself to be sick so I can recover.
HOLLIE COOK
And while I was out in the back yard I binned his old deflated football and mashed up tennis ball collection. He liked to pester me with those on the rare times I was gardening. He had his own priorities. He usually won. Because he was actually the boss.
I have sent out an email and if there is no reply within 48 hours another winner will be drawn.
For consider Him who has endured such hostility by sinners against Himself, so that you will not grow weary and lose heart.
Thank you all who came down tonight and to you all for making things like this possible.
Hops: My hops only produced a few cones, with the 60 plus days of 100+ temps it seemed to fool my hops into flowering too early, by the end of August the vines were already turning brown. The Willamette got to about 7 feet and the Nugget to about 3 0r 4. I am hoping they have a good root structure and will produce very well next year.
Of course, I'm so grateful that anyone thinks of me - ever - to invite to parties, I'm absolutely not complaining about the invitations. The more reassurance I get that I'm a reasonably normal and social human being, the better. And I had a very excellent time at both gatherings, especially at Karla May's. That was a lovely way to cap off the weekend.
Art next to window
7,057 — spaces McMaster consultants in 1969 believed would be needed by 1980
This e-book is a culmination of experience gathered from several years of blogging and a whole lot of mistakes. I'm constantly learning new things and how to better myself and my brand. I might learn a life-changing lesson tomorrow! If I do, I promise to write about it and send it to you so you can maybe learn from my mix-ups. Some mistakes you just need to make yourself though, so take my e-book with a grain of salt. Look at it as one single method. What works for me may be the last thing that works for you! But sometimes all we need is a fresh perspective.
A few tips on making your zine:
Needless to say, he survived, and he grew up into the sweetest and most loving cat I've ever known. The Schrodinger name stuck, although sometimes I just called him Erwin because it's easier to say. When Laura was little, she couldn't pronounce Schrodinger or Erwin, so she just called him "Cat". That name kind of stuck with him too, so sometimes we just called him "Cat". People always give me a weird look when I tell them I have a cat named Cat, so I just tell them it's easier to pronounce than Schrodinger. Then they give me an even weirder look.
Something annoyed me today. I bet you can’t guess where I was when it annoyed me! I’ll give you a hint:
After Kinetics went out of business, I had my own storefront and website that I taught punchart on and and sold the packets for the classes as well as the leftover product from Kinetics. When punchart became less popular I shut down that site and joined an ATC group on Yahoo. I then decided to start my own ATC group and blog shortly after that.
For me those three letters represent struggle; pain; misunderstanding; confusion; loss; rejection; and the most overwhelming love I have ever known.
He wanted to stay with them instead.
“Why was that?”
Which our boys lose. *sigh* The underdogs in any drama are beaten down for at least the first 8 episodes. They end up losing the next showdown as well but instead of being annoyed, you begin to see the loving, caring friendships our boys have, how loyal they are and how they protect one another. The song our leader finished is posted online and suddenly our boys are popular. A big recording company takes notice and offers a contract but only for 2 of the members of Eye-Candy. Our leader refuses, his loyalty not to be messed with. (I was cheering) They are then offered a contract for the whole band. There is also romance developing between our OTP that will take everyone back to that first crush. (I do remember awkwardly avoiding each other in the hallways) *hee* I couldn’t stop grinning. First kiss in episode 6 was lovely but no one beyond these 2 know that they’re seeing each other. First big mistake: not telling your friends about your new boyfriend/girlfriend.
Should I go sweet and just hi, or talk about something worth while, post pictures...I don't know, but I do know I am going to try and keep this up.
On Monday the New York Times had an article about brides using a feeding tube diet to lose weight. The May issue of Glamour, had an article about women so desperate to lose weight that they getting an operation called POSE, which is a surgery similiar to Gastric Bypass surgery, just to lose 25 pounds! These surgeries cost anywhere from $1000 to $12,000 and are not even FDA approved. No one knows what the long term effects will be. I have personally seen women with chunky patches or lumps on their legs and thighs from liposuction. Those are just the visible signs, but what about the patients I have trained who have had gastric bypass? There are numerous health complications from that as well.
WELCOME! Thank you all for joining the I Am Roses Fall in to Autumn 2011 Blog Hop! The Design Team is thrilled to share these special projects with you showcasing some of the latest flowers and old favorites.
How, they wondered, does one productively co-exist with a boy (or boys) who seem to have a constant need for movement?
1. Door Peeper
I was about to write that I haven’t seen much going on outdoors as I look through the window while drinking my coffee, when I saw three ducks circling the woods across from me. They didn’t look like mallards, they weren’t, it was two male and a female wood duck, so I guess it is time to get moving!
It is said that there are four main reasons to study economics:
his painted pasta necklace
"Both presentations hailed substantial gains on the 'heads of agreement', which at best are temporary and in most cases are based on hopes rather than hard facts. For example, an NHS official welcomed the protection on contributions for members earning less than £26,558 but failed to point out that this is only for 2012 and that the government wants acceptance of 9.8% average pension contributions for 2012-14. Despite the mass of power point slides, the LGPS presentation in particular, was very hazy on details. By the way, nobody was able to explain when UNISON stopped calling for pensions based on final salary and started advocating average career earnings schemes as being more 'equality-proof'. It would be ludicrous to push CARE without details on accrual rates and revaluation etc.
Halloween does not mean it needs to be just fun for the kids. Check out all the fun Halloween Costumes edenfantasys has to offer and surprise your husband for a night of adventure and fun. I love that the site is tasteful and it has a lot of wonderful reviews by people just like you and me. Browse and you might be surprise by how many products are out there just to make it more fun in the bedroom. You can start of small and just enhance and set the mood with candles and massage kits who does not want that at the end of a stressful day. With the Holidays coming up if you are anything like me you are already making all your to do lists. Just don't overlook the fundamentals of a relationship. Having a healthy sex life is not just a health benefit but it also keeps your relationship happy and connected. Trust me I am the first person to admit that sex has not always been a priority in my life and you can become roommates with your spouse. There is nothing wrong with making it a priority and one way you can get the conversation going is by exploring edenfantasys together as a couple. The packages arrive at your door un marked so it can be kept private. You can explore the site at the comfort of your own home and whenever you want. There are not open hours online.
Palawan Bay in the Philippines is an important part of the country’s claim to part of the South China Sea. (Photo: Mary Kay Magistad) China, citing historical discoveries, says that the entire South China Sea should be its own exclusive economic zone.
Let me back up in a metaphorical, non-geographical sense.
Planks or drywall? What would you choose?
A quiet house, a quiet mind, a lull before the storm.
I can't tell you what to do. There are no right or wrong answers, just better ideas and better choices, only you get to decide what those are. X will either comply with your ideas and choices or he won't. Ultimately, X will, in about 3 yrs or less, decide for himself whether or not he'll agree or disagree, or whether or not he'll maintain any sort of relationship with either of his parents. That's the way it works. What you, as the parent, do now will determine much of that.
“He’s just watching out for me. Trust me, nothing is there. But he is awesome.”
Conclusion -
Cowboy Cassanova – Carrie Underwood
You may not realize it but people love to spread hate when they feel that they aren’t getting enough love. The enemy needs to bring you to an equal playing field, which is a level down (his playing field). You stay above the enemies playing field because God is above hate, envy, jealousy, bitterness, and evildoing. I rest in the Peace of God, knowing that I don’t have to prove myself in anyone’s eyes but my own and God, my Creator.” Love the HELL out of them! For God is Love & Love is God.
We just celebrated Canada Day, and every July 1 I feel humbled to live in this country. I don’t think we fully realize how wonderful it is to be as free as we are. But this will only remain a great country if we, its people, keep demanding that government do only what is necessary, and that we, its citizens, be permitted to pursue our own interests. That builds a country where we’re not trying to take from each other. We’re not trying to do the minimum. We’re working hard, because we get to enjoy what we work for. I’m proud to be a Canadian. Economic freedom, no polygamy, and thus much less tragedy. Sounds pretty good to me.
It's a beautiful wine bottle in the loveliest shade of jewel-blue. I placed it on our bathroom window sill just for some interest in the tiny room. For weeks it's stood there, mighty lonely...
You don’t need a collection of essays to figure out why Springsteen is so relevant and important to American music and, indeed, American culture. What you need is a ticket to one of his shows.
But, I need a break.
Then so serious in her steep hard climb
She chose to debut with the Tamil movie Thamizhan for which she also did a playback. Post Thamizhan, she did a number of movies like Blackmail, Baraat, Karam, Bluffmaster! that did average on the box office. She was trying to find a footing with the movie Mujhse Shaadi Karogi but it was her role of Sonia in the movie Aitraz that cemented her hold in the industry. She went on to win the Filmfare for the Best Villain Award.
He nodded and walked me to my car.
I can’t promise this will be my last post on the awesomeness of pizza, but what I can say with just about 98% certainty, is that I will not make pizza in the oven again.
Article 153
Salt water taffy
Kaisercraft Droplets- Clear and Pink.
I was to experience the nature and wildlife of Africa.
We applaud The Daily News’ editorial staff for identifying a critical problem in oversight of animal welfare organizations that we entrust with our dogs and cats, that have a special place in the heart of Americans. But the problem is much more extensive than setting standards for “shelters.”
Result: 8 (Sara)
Finally finished with 2nd quarter, it actually did not seem that long, but I am happy for fresh new classes. My fresh new classes include two aesthetic courses, one is digital. Hopefully they are not the same, it might make the class seem easier, but to make two assignments that are the same seems a bit much.
and will try just about ANYTHING.
“Before I even left the house, my husband made sure I knew I’d ruined his day completely. Did he forget he ruined mine months ago by quitting his job just because he didn’t like it?” Her words echo’ed in the room. What do you say to that? I just quietly laid there and said a soft, “yeah.” There’s nothing to answer to that.
This story happens to be true. At the time, I would feel certain things and dismiss them as coincidences or premonitions. I now know there is no such thing as coincidence, and there is definitely such a thing as Fate.
**You will skip the outside holes**
Crumb Topping:
9 October
Many in a major monetary way,
Now go check out what the rest of the IHP design team did with this challenge:
I won’t hurt myself.
It's made in the crock pot.
Group: 1d6 highest goes first.
I nominate:
And maybe, just maybe, I'll post some pictures.
Of students who had been cyberbullied relatively frequently—at least twice in the months preceding the study—the same research shows that:
The class was two hours long but easily could have been halved without too much trouble. Soooooo much repetition, and with a 20 minute break in the middle, we were both looking at each other with an “oh my god why is this taking so long” look on our faces. As a lover of being a student, it is always disappointing to me when a class I’m really looking forward to ends up being not nearly as fantastic as I had hoped. Usually I would drop the class and pick up another, but that’s not really an option in this situation.
Now everyone understands my “thing” with dragonflies. I consider them to be very significant. There have been times when I have seen dragonflies in places where you should not be seeing them. I consider things like that to be signs from my dear friend. A sweet greeting of hello, keep your chin up. Everything will be okay!
Contrast solid – 1/8-ish yard
He said it when I was in middle school and feeling uninspired to go to school that day (maybe some of those times I was actually, really sick, too). He said it when I was in high school, feeling sad over something that had happened. He said it so much over the years, it became more hilarious than irritating.
we are doing it again this year!
1.Dry roast dry chillies ,coriander and 1tsp of coriander for about 1-2 mins and keep aside.
Ok, after this....photo BOMB!!
The specific issue highlighted by Matsumura and Murata is the risk and consequences of the failure of the spent fuel pool at the destroyed reactor unit 4 at Fukushima-Daiichi. As they report the spent fuel inventory at this pool is the largest of all 4 reactors that were destroyed by the earthquake and tsunami in March 2011.
Judy B
“Public opinion,” he writes, “is no longer seen to be independent of mass media sway” (Santa Ana 49). The way in which writers discuss populations matter, and their metaphors about the growing Latino population as “an overwhelming flood” or a “foreign invasion” resonates with readers and builds an image of a looming threat that is certain to overcome them (Santa Ana 71-3).
And it’s political too because after the initial breakdown they begin doing a bit of policing in the smaller towns and “freedom camps” they let us keep. And what this leads to is collaborators, just like French collaborators during World War II. Which is a scenario I’ve been interested in ever since I read “Troubled Sleep”.
2009 Oracle Pinotage
Lie #2: Unregulated hunting on public lands
2 pounds boneless pork shoulder, cut into 1-inch cubes, chilled
I pray that you’ll let me love you.
55.814601 , 13.728526
Is this the United States of America or a Middle Eastern country where democracy is crushed under the iron fist of the police and military?
Here's a simple dinner I made this evening inspired by a recipe in the Weightwatchers cookbook "Cook, Eat, Enjoy" - though I adapted it quite substantially!
Kid#1 I’m just saying because of how she died. You guys weren’t wondering that?
Last week I went out to lunch with four friends (should have been five but one couldn't make it) I haven't seen for at least 10 years. We spent our late teens and early twenties together dancing every night listening to the various pop groups that played at our local night spot. We do keep in touch, on Facebook and send Christmas cards but haven't actually got together for such a long time. It was great to meet up and talk about what we have all been doing the past years and talk about all times. We've made a solemn vow to meet up every couple of months at least and hopefully we will all be there next time. Here we are enjoying lunch.
4.Diamonds & Rust
Leviticus 19:2 Speak unto all the congregation of the children of Israel, and say unto them, Ye shall be holy: for I the LORD your God am holy.
(iv)It also appears that we may have been a little too critical of the judgment passed by the District Court restraining Hilton from threatening Hilltone. For some reason all of us, me included, appeared to have been under the impression that Hilton’s reputation as a world-famous brand was undisputable. A District Judge however is required to assess the evidence and pass an order on the same. In the present case the Plaintiffs i.e. Hilltone were able to prove that they were using the ‘Hilltone’ mark since 1973, while the Defendants, Hilton, were not able to muster any evidence that they were operational in India prior to this date. Given that the right to use a trademark is linked to its actual use, it is reasonable to argue that if Hilton entered India only in 1995, it has no business trying to gag an Indian hotel which has been using a similar mark, not identical, since 1973 i.e. 22 years before Hilton entered the Indian market. At the end of the day, a district judge is required to decide on the evidence before him and I think given the evidence presented before this particular judge, he has done a decent job.
“If he dies, he dies.” said Drago to the press. Seriously, Sly. Let someone read your scripts before you film them.
Normally, it wouldn't be a big deal, but that means it'll be twelve hours before I see my little boy again, and then he's going to have to go straight to bed (as are we) if we expect to be awake and ready to go on time the next morning.
Walker Brothers The sun ain’t gonna shine anymore US
In the yellowy aged parchment past,
And that is where I have to ask: who can actually practice Buddhism? It seems that trying to would test a monk. What chance do any of us living in the world have? In the abstract, it's easy enough to sign on to all the "right" modes of conduct, but how much choice do we actually have?
- 17.4 lbs. He isn't making any huge leaps but he does seem to keep gaining weight steadily so I am pretty happy about that. I don't know his height, but Drew and I were both saying he looks really long to us. We will get a real measurement at his nine month appointment.
Posters and fences enclose the wasteland, although not much effort has been expended in keeping them up, revealing an absolutely huge, poisoned-looking grass expanse, broken up by two buildings and a public sculpture. The wager was that 'Boro might become a tourist destination, if Alsop and invited architects like FAT were to be given their head; the renders in front of the wastes show a Super Mario World which bitterly contrasts with what is in front of your nose. The public sector levelled the area for, so far, an optimistic temporary suite designed as an aptly upturned lime green box, and the new Middlesbrough College by Hickton Madely at Archial. This is a huge building, and aside from the Bridge it dominates Middlehaven, its curving mass covered in a silver and yellow cladding, with small windows punched into it at random. Round the back, it's a huge white shed, as if we wouldn't be looking. Far away is the other building – the Docks' Clock Tower, attributed to Philip Webb – tall, gaunt and profoundly haunting in this dreamlike, spacious and sinister context. Between the dereliction is red and black landscaping, carrying at least some of the renders' cartoonish promise, connecting the area to the football stadium, or to another publicly funded project – Anish Kapoor's Temenos.
Light bulb moment!
Do you stick to your own roles in the band or do you mix it up and experiment?
Well, they probably said “Wha? Fackin’ cahnt! Whars me fags, innit?” but I think we get the point.
Seeing as my last Ms Page purchase was a bit gapey, I've opted for the small to fit my 27" waist. I can't wait for it to arrive!
Though Herbstreit occasionally expressed regret regarding the affair, specifically its secretive nature and the guilt over cheating on his own wife of nine years, he was always “willing to sign memorabilia after our lovemaking,” according to Winters.
These are the real deal. They don’t have an agenda. Other than sating some deep, dark hunger. And not a Twinkie in sight. Just approximately 40,005 tasty seals.
Jacob Miller is an inner-city boy who hates being black and poor. He reluctantly assists his little brother Peewee in making a black snowman from the filthy snow in the back alley. The figure comes alive after they unknowingly drape him in a fragment of the magical kente , a cloth worn by African storytellers for hundreds of years. The snowman challenges Jacob’s outlook on life by telling him all the wonderful things that are black, and mysteriously conjuring forth brave heroes from African tribal tradition. When Peewee is trapped inside a burning building, the snowman shows Jacob a way to save his brother while exhorting the boy to believe in himself. Using mystical elements and the power of the past, Mendez, in his first book, weaves a stirring tale of Jacob’s transformation from a bitter victim of his situation into a proud fighter for his life. Byard’s haunting color drawings bring to life not only the snowman; they successfully portray the many contrasts between Jacob’s dour moods, Peewee’s optimism, the dingy apartment and the eerie parade of stately African tribesmen.
1 oz. Willamette (5% AA, 15 min.) Flowers
Paul and the Jews worshipped the same God. They, except for a few, believed in the resurrection of the dead. They believed in a coming hope for eternity. They preached a means of forgiveness. They were all creationists. The list may go on. Why would they be at enmity with the apostle Paul?
In this reality, certain people have what are called Skills and these Skills have led to the rise of two crimes bosses in “the City”. It was very mafia-esque in this dog-eat-dog world where allegiances collide quite spectacularly at times. I love the idea that a tattoo on your arm could bind you so tightly to a syndicate that any attempt to go against your boss’s orders would result in your body killing itself. Certainly a very bleak image of life though I have no doubts that this is what organised crime would become in such a world.
NYX matte - Nude (applied under brow with MAC 217 by patting, then blending downward)
Thank you for joining us today - have a wonderful weekend! We're back next week with some fun Tube projects as well as a co-feature with The Twinery!
So that's what I've learned from this week's Top of the Pops. If you're made of chocolate you might as well eat your hands. Never let it be said TV can't be educational.
We tend to think of hacking and blagging in terms of tabloid journalism, but it’s becoming clear that the spread of this cancer goes well beyond the press organs. Cloning IDs is big business now around the world, but here too – while this activity has become something of a media obsession – it shrinks in comparison to the use of hacking and blagging in the financial sector.
The problem? It's weird to look back over my work and see "What's His Faces" everywhere. I'll need to change that soon. Also, I'm getting kind of attached. Do you think readers will mind terribly if I keep "What's His Face" for names?
Wanting to follow their great success in Ixelles, the pair, along with
You have seen the fab creations of our designers and guest designers and the lovely crafting CD-Rom our lucky winner will get in this challenge.
Speaking at the event , Mr. Leke Alder, the Founder and Principal of Alder Consulting, dwelt on “Modern Biology; Future Chemistry”, focusing on the fundamental of business ideas.
Murata Mitsuhei
Praise Him for your salvation!
Today is a day for Funeral Moth.
When it comes to a fair deal the current milk prices make grim reading as the shelf price for four pints has remained largely static at around £1.27 for 4 pints since February 2011, and widespread promotions continue to be offered on liquid milk in May with Sainsbury’s and Asda offering 2 x 4 pints for £2.00 and Tesco offering 3 x 4 pints for £3.00. Supermarkets are also widely offering branded and organic milk on promotion – guess who takes the hit for cost cutting – the farmers!
Pride is expensive. You can't afford pride. Plus, pride is idiotic. Look, if you need stuff and people are willing to give you stuff, take the stuff.
Oh, and I love you
Nora: "NO WAY! I only will go on the potty TOMORROW! NOT TODAY!!!"
Cameron said: “I don’t seek to excuse them. I don’t see to try to explain them away. There is no complacency at all in this government in dealing with what is a very tough situation that frankly has just got tougher.”
Half a third cup of Sugar
So what to look for?
Sanjay Leela Bhansali is known for his sharp music sense. He first discovered Ismail Darbar and as a team, they gave two blockbusters with Hum Dil De Chuke Sanam and Devdas. His risk paid off, and the music was a huge hit.
Soon they will be able
Today would have been my Grandma Neal’s 90th birthday. Five years ago, on a December day in Columbus, Ohio, grandma was on her way to her second Christmas party gathering of the day, blacked out while driving and drove off the road. By the time the ambulance got her to the hospital, she had already gone to be with Jesus.
policeman, you are the light of the service. If you are a soldier, you are the
My first recipe of the year, and penultimate item from the Blackface meat box, was a huge 1.9 kg rack of Blackface mutton. The key difference in flavour between lamb and mutton is the sheep’s transition from a milk-based to grass-based diet. My rack came from a five year old mutton (consider that lambs are under the one year mark). As a result you get a dark, burgundy-coloured meat with a layer of fat and a richer flavour. According to Blackface’s website, their five year old ewes are carefully fattened to ensure that their award-winning mutton is tender and juicy. Oh wow, did this turn out to be true.
We also watched some old videos of family gatherings and laughed at old versions of ourselves. It was such a fun New year's day. Next year, I promise I'm gonna wear polka dots!
'A violet in the youth of primy Nature
She went on to explain that I am trying too hard to protect the feelings of an ex-girlfriend that reads my other blog. Which is true. I have so much love for her and despite the pain she has caused me, I don’t want to cause any towards her with this. This information would be catastrophic to her. The ex-girlfriend and the friend the post refers to are in a long-term dislike/hate towards each other. (I hate to admit that I am the reason for the split in their friendship. However, me and friend knew each other way before ex came along.) Anyways…this question is what made me a big girl:
Take me down I cry, take me down
Saturday, Giovanni finally took the plunge and
Everything about this bothers me, and I’m not alone. A
The second time I saw her she was sprawled across two seats, wide legged and looking bewildered at a girl in her yoga clothes, laughing at herself with her bottle of wine in a paper bag.
Or perhaps even grant it to you for the very first time.
DCWV CS- Metallic stack
There then follows an 'assessment' of sweetness and bitterness, both of which which are graded from 1-5 with the aid of further illustrations.
It is probably NOT essential to watch introduction videos, especially if you have some experience with Prismas already.
Link to videos:
The first two examples did feature in the Trophy. Arguably one of the best 3 or 4 bonsai on the benches that weekend. David Benevente’s fabulous tree, I recall being with a party of Willowboggers at one of the Ginkgo Awards shows in which this bonsai featured and joining in the universal admiration of the image by our group !
So I officially decided that Air force and Navy were my top two choices and Marines my third. Marines would have been my number one had they had a career path I was interested in.
Hay: "There's a home-based VP of sales role here; £80 to £100k selling BPO. What's BPO?"
And that’s where my momma’s trouble begins…
For a song nearly 3 minutes long, "I Saw Her Standing There" (ISHST) sures packs a lot into the first 7 seconds. Paul counts us in with a "One, two three" and a shouted "Four!" While the guitars riff on an E chord, Paul's bass line starts pounding away. Overlaying it all, handclaps are heard; two quick claps on the second beat, another on the fourth.
Aww shit! Torture me why don’t you! LOL. Ugh. Questions like this are really tough for me but here goes. I’m gonna kill Sisko because (and only because!) he’s sort of in weird Prophet limbo-land anyways and that makes it mighty convenient for me. I’m most attracted physically to Picard and if I have to wake up next to one of them everyday (uhh, yes please) I guess it would be him. Kirk’s a total manwhore but the flip side of that is he’s gotta know all kinds of crazy awesome tricks, right? So as long as he’s cleared by medical I’ll bang Kirk.
by Oskar Blues, Lyons, CO
Now you’re sighing. How could spending four months in Europe be DIFFICULT?! Yeah, that’s exactly the mentality I had. But guess what? It IS, as surprising as that may be. I’ve thrown myself into a very close knit society. One that is not open. One that doesn’t understand saying I love you. One whose primary language is not English, but a language so complex and lacking in generality of rules that Americans who have lived here for a third of their life and taken multiple classes have not been able to pick up the language. I’m living with a family that is not my own in a house that is not my own, and try as I might to think it’s comparable to college, I know it’s not. College doesn’t bring you into a situation where you’re living with people who have been living together for 20+ years. That’s a whole different dynamic to break into. I’m walking past people on the street who don’t acknowledge me, running past cars with people who don’t wave back. And all of these things are so special and wonderful and unique in their own right, and I can’t stress that enough. Equally, they are also so terribly frustrating that I probably have, at some point, shed tears or ranted about them. I’m beginning to learn that that’s all part of this process.
Sorry Buffalo Bill. See you next year.
Hope over fear.
It pains me to think that the receivers of the most grace one could ever imagine are the ones not spreading grace to a man who needs it.
But all I see is dissolution, as chaos fills our eyes
Silver: Oil Change Stout, Flat Branch Pub and Brewery, Columbia, MO
I mean, I don't shout that.
Tops L1552
Don't whisper of how swiftly virtue fell
The people I worked with were seldom happy people. Often times their life problems were the natural result of their own choices but that didn’t mean they had stopped being human. They lived with an undefined hopelessness that dogged their every step an kept them fighting with each other for the scraps of happiness or ease that were available to such as them. One thing that was consistent about these individuals was that they were not Christians and for the most part had no defined ideas about eternity or purpose. Vague thoughts of future riches, attractive women, drunken vacations, and nicer things were the hopes of the future, and a twelve pack in front of the t.v. or a party with some old friends were the hopes of the present. A few of them, like Glen, had escaped the poverty of the laborer but had not yet found satisfaction. Life was still frustratingly determined to keep them from true joy. Whatever their social or financial status they all displayed elements of something resembling Darwin’s survival of the fittest. At some level they were all in competition with each other for what they considered a limited amount of resources. There was just so much happiness available out there, and they had to fight to get their rightful portion.
Sales coming up! Hint~ It's from the Vintage Gypsy line.
I had to have a filling at the dentist on Tuesday, I'm such a wuss and my dentist is amazing I never feel any pain, he says I never stop talking even with a mouthful of implements!
Now Evie, formerly Toswiah, has a new name and, it appears, a new family. Her popular cheerleader sister Cameron, now known as Anna, is prone to tearful outbursts. Her mother has become a committed Jehovah’s Witness and no longer allows the family to enjoy familiar birthday and holiday rituals. Perhaps the most upsetting change is in Evie’s father who has not only lost his name but his identity as a cop. This shooting brought his two identities—as a cop and a black man—into conflict. To protect one was to betray the other. Now, having brought his family to a safe new home, he sits in a rocking chair, deep in depression.
4 cloves garlic crushed
Considered as a persuasive phenomenon, or a general component of the collection's arrangement, there is certainly a sense of omnipresence of art. Students are instructed to be "centralized" and focused on the ensembles as didactic "chalkboards", thus by virtue of these assembled visages, the dedicated gaze is immediately met with an artificial face; an oracle of sorts, which imparts a symbolic direction to those seekers who face down the occasionally intimidating walls. They also function as a mirror, in which different aspects of ourselves can be seen - not unlike the assumed human presence in landscapes (picturing ourselves as being there). This is, if it is true, meant as both comforting and confrontational, two aspects of the best of art collections. But mysteriously oracular? That is all Barnes Foundation.
There was comfort in thinking I was part of a chosen people. Comfort in believing we had the truth when the world around us didn’t. Comfort in knowing if I did X, Y, and Z that I’d be with my family forever throughout eternity. The temple ceremonies, which sealed husband to wife and parent to child, were unique to our religion, and I knew that.
Brewed: 07-22-2009
Lots of love, Anna
Here’s a couple of thoughts from the scrimmage, won 20-14 by Scarlet:
I told him I wasn’t.
These are my sweatpants that I’ve had since college. I’ve lost more money than the original price of these pants, but I’ve never lost them. I love them.
Have a fantastic day!
Stamps: PTI Love Songs, Tiny Treats Valentines, Wplus9 Heartfelt Mix
They are not alone in that respect. Harrison writes her human characters just as well - Tanya is resourceful and courageous; Fabian is geeky and intelligent; Red is punky and perfect (seriously want to be reading more about her in the next two books!) Their voices are distinct and they felt fully-fleshed.
I think this is gonna be FUN!!!!
According to Republican strategist Alex Castellanos, the fact that women make less than men is really just a myth. In fact, says Castellanos, if women did indeed make less than men:
Back in March, The 35-year-old actress posted a video on her website, The Kind Life, in which she pre-chewed food and had Bear eat it directly out of her mouth. The video sparked a huge controversy on the Web over whether or not the practice — premastication, or pre-chewing solid food for an infant — was hygienic.
The following is written in substantial reliance on a very helpful note prepared by Hugh Goodfellow (Carpmaels & Ransford), sent to this weblog by his colleague Edward Oates.
I like to laugh at all the little things that bug me. I’m quirky. (That sounds better than whiny.) But really, I enjoy my practice so much, it wouldn’t matter if all those things happened in the same class. But remember, keep your feet on your own mat! Namaste!
Once you gain feedback from your customers, you have to actually listen. It can be difficult to hear that something you thought would be a promotional success didn’t work out as well as you had planned. But remember that it’s better to make a change to your marketing for the betterment of the company’s bottom line.
Getting your book reviewed is one of the most difficult aspects of publishing a book - whether you’re doing it yourself or through a publishing house. We’re all eager to have our books noticed and recommended to the lovely readers we hope to entertain, inform or intrigue. Magazine and newspaper review sections have contracted over the past few years, so sources of hard-copy review are hard to find and usually closed to independently published books. But, at the same time, Cyber-reviewing has expanded into outer space and beyond.
She has no life beyond writing.
His complacent eagerness to sacrifice the household goods of poor folk was backed by Bacon. The poor ought to be taxed as heavily as the rich: because, as he quoted in Latin, it was a right and 'sweet course to pull together in an equal yoke'.
Soon gave me to know I had nothing to dread;
That said, I’m trying to change that. Often, I’m so ravenous by lunch that I make poor choices. Also, I feel like breakfast sets the tone for the rest of your day, and I’d like that tone to be a good one. For me, the key to success is having something quick and easy on hand that I don’t even have to think about. Trust me, I have a hard enough time finding my keys and making sure that my teeth are brushed before I go catch the train (I keep a spare toothbrush in my desk at work, just in case).
Thank you for taking the time to read this long post and I would also like to Thank God, for the conviction placed upon my heart to write this post as well for allowing the Holy Spirit to guide me with this post because without God’s guidance this post would have never been created…
When looking for a campsite, check with Federal and state agencies, as they have millions of acres available for horse camping and trail riding. These agencies include the National Forest Service, Bureau of Land Management, National Park Service, State Parks and even the Army Corps of Engineers. For a list of trails and campgrounds visit www.horseandmuletrails.com
fought these unsubstantiated claims, declared his willingness to fight for his constituents for a full term, garnered the support from local trade union barons, won the day and immediately rolled over to allow the NEC to err parachute in David Miliband and for himself to undergo that transformational role and ascend from trade unionist to a comfy green seat in the House of
All you say is, “Just wait, it’s coming, we will get you soon.” If you had any power and could do anything to keep me quiet, you would have done so already, or now.
Jackie, her husband and daughter - she also has two sons. Jackie's extremely handsome and talented husband is in advertising and is quite famous for writing one of the most successful ad campaigns "What Happens In Vegas, Stays In Vegas!!!!"
I am posting a loose edit. Why? Sometimes, I am afraid that I do not make the right final choice. But, I'm sure this is a common feeling amongst photographers, especially now that so much is shot in the digital world. I only get 12 shots per roll. And I'm thankful for that. It makes me focus. And I like to focus.
Now i'm going to go outside and stand in the rain for a while. It can be quite calming in a way.
For all of their dominance, Arsenal were not creating a lot of clear openings as the first half peetered out. Equally, Stoke were not troubling the visitors defence, even from their trademark set-pieces. Arsenal were comfortably in control. The second half continued in the same pattern with van Persie unable to beat Begovic with his header. Chances flew over the bar to safety after that whilst Gibbs on a rare foray forward found his route to goal blocked by a neolithic remnant.
You will walk.
The night before Dan and I left (we had to leave earlier than the others), we all did get to have a down home, meat and potatoes dinner: steaks brought from ND by Dan and me, baked potatoes, corn on the cob, toasted bread and salad. And afterward, the six of us hunkered down before the fireplace to listen to the "boys" - Dickie, Danny and Scotty - reminisce about their grandparents' homestead, their boyhood days, their parents and other beloved relatives. It was a great ending to a great trip.
I'll let you know how that one pans out.
The brewing trade is very lucky at the moment as there are a multitude of new hop varieties appearing from all over the world which gives brewers an ideal opportunity to brew one off seasonal brews with sometimes staggeringly good results, the wine world is not so lucky grape varieties for the most part are established.
with the new website and blog for my business!
Thought you might like to see a real photo of what they look like. And, they only show when the engine is hot. (See photo at link)
So why, then, do we need a huge article full of what are apparently tips to get your boyfriend/husband/random UPS guy to go “OMG, you have boobs, that’s so hot!”? They’re boobs. They accomplish that just by existing. They don’t need a PR campaign.
Again, hope your day is eggstra special!!
Happy Wednesday - what's on your Bead Table??
Very.
Req: be able to read 1 chapter from my confusing book.
Shooting will take place for a month, and Julia-Levy promised to have a teaser within about six weeks and to release the film well before the December date on which the Mayan calendar cycle ends.
Going to bed to the roaring of Lions to the North of camp was a good sign which would only get better waking to them and by the sounds of things they had moved closer. While having morning coffee we could hear them moving slowly to the East. So setting off on drive we headed to the North East and Ingwelala Airstrip hoping that luck would shine on us as it was very close to our Northern traversing boundary. Not finding anything on the airstrip we continued North to check the tar road and shortly before arriving there we found tracks for what looked like an adolescent Lion heading to the North. We did not have to track for long before we could confirm that it had crossed out to the North. We still believe the others are in a very large block on Ingwelala and have a sneaky feeling it is the Timbavati Females and the Maghlatini Males, so we can only hope that they will move a little further to the South so we can confirm our
The next stop was at a culvert under a large raintree that doubled as a bus-stop. There were some cows grazing around and at this old woman who wanted them to move in a particular direction, but I couldn’t really figure out which. Then she gave up and started chatting to some other folks sitting under a tree in the field nearby. An ox-cart passed me by here with a pair of sturdy-looking oxen pulling in front while 3 people sat in the back with some bundled up stuff. Since they were moving so slowly, I got nice long stares before being asked to take photos of them. No camera, I lied. They moved on. Then I figured I best just keep moving on slowly since I couldn’t really take a nap anyway. So I just poured water over my head and moved on myself.
"You had people burning the Union flag. People were being kicked - some of them weren't anything to do with the protests.
It's hard to not admire the simple symbolic power of a bridge. Each year our Pre-K kids, on the second to the last day of school, cross a little bridge I've built from blocks, a ceremony of easy to grasp meaning. A bridge means what it is, a way from one side to another: made no less profound by it's bald-facedness.
I go to a book club sometimes with one of my friends. They meet once a month, it’s usually fun, there is always wine, and I have enjoyed the selections so far, but my attendance isn’t great.
These 2 sets are in my etsy now, but I gladly take commissions on this style; you choose the colors and number of beads ;-)
Because I've investigated and studied free motion quilting for so long, and shared so much, aren't you more likely to purchase books from me than some other, unknown source?
See, my goals for this race were just to come in under an hour. Heck, 59:58 would have a PR. Before I left for the race I'd done a quick race pace calculation and determined I'd aim for 9:20 per mile. I didn't want to burn out, so after my shock at mile one I decided to pull back a bit.
Ooi said the council’s threat to take legal action against her was an attempt at preventing the rakyat from expressing their views.
The controversy about trade with the Falklands was born out of a piece from London’s The Sun saying that Uruguay ‘was breaking the trade embargo imposed on the Falklands by Argentina’, with a business delegation that will be flying to the Islands with a chartered aircraft next April 13.
And every time I stop,
4 pounds lean beef stew meat
I have started a new audio book which I will give some feedback on once I am a little further in. I am a bit of a sucker for self-help / motivational type books, I hope this one is a good read.
Let’s return to the meat of the story and the actions of Ms. Reding. In this passage, I like how she blames “society” because companies didn’t kow-tow to her voluntary suggestions.
Whether the player was ready was determined by a variety of factors: how much gear she had from the prior tier and how strong her raiding fundamentals were, most importantly. Notably, back then, relevant gear from the boss came from the previous tier (not from 5-mans), and conveniently, farming more gear also caused players to practice their raid skills. She found out whether she was ready for the new boss in a simple way, by attempting it with her raid team. This process required some effort from the players involved, and may have been frustrating at times. But what we want to emphasize is that it was genuine. Bosses provided a ladder of progression, and you prepared as much as you needed in each rung to ascend to the next. Ascension was determined by merit only: the player could kill the next boss or she couldn’t. Some people might need more gear than others, or more time building their skills on easier bosses. Some groups may kill a new boss earlier simply by having the drive to attempt it for longer. In any case, it was always there waiting for her to either kill it, or not. And for that reason, and that reason alone, when she killed it, it meant something.
because it goes against their ‘conscience’. I don’t give a rat’s ass about your’ conscience’; if the prescription is for a LEGAL DRUG DISPENSED BY A PHARMACY
The nearest town to Litchfield is Batchelor and we wanted to drive through and see what it was like and what was there. It's only small (pop of about 350) but we all thought it was a really nice, tidy looking little community. There is a pool and school, and lots of tree'd park areas and a little grocery store and petrol station and a new looking pub etc. We parked the vans near the pool and left them there while we drove the 70km into the national park to the cafe.
*Data and statistics based on information from Carolina Multiple Listing Service Inc. Information deemed reliable but not guaranteed.
my senses reeling with pleasure and promise.
Culdocentesis
I've been quite busy of the past few days so haven't had a chance to sit down and really think about how the visit would go. It has been on my mind though and I've gone through many scenarios in my head. It's also caused me to revisit feelings and experiences from my past and has almost transported me back to the last few times I saw may parents and how I felt then. That's quite disorientating as it reminds me of how I was before my transition and the way I looked and acted - both of which I have tried hard to forget.
(Spreading the word and carrying the message to others)
I then had to completely remove the skirt, recut the top, fold over the top edge, gathered and hand stitched it to the boned bodice lining. Once that was done I stitched the bodice black chiffon back on and re stitched on the vintage beaded trim, keeping it only on the black this time. To balance out the decoration on the bodice I added a row of spaced gold seed beads to the ivory "scarf".
8 years of photos in scrapbooks
Hall 25 feels like a second home to me now. I know where to expect Walker, Bloomsbury, Orion, Frances Lincoln to be and there they are. Also Nosy Crow. But this year sees a huge new stand for Bonnier.
My little 3 are still pretty unadventurous and will have things like toasties or eggs or speedy noodle dishes, the kinds of recipes that I write about in Tiny & Little magazine. Meals for their age. Simple, good quality, nutritious food.
Josh Matthews is indeed there, interviewing the new champion. Mark said Josh didn’t believe he would be holding the most coveted prize in the business, and he told the crowd to stop cheering because they didn’t believe him either. We are all haters, and doubters. He wants to welcome us to the Hall of Pain. He is going to become the most dominant champion, and will never lose this title. He’ll face anyone. Great moment for him.
I am so excited I can hardly contain myself!
2 garlic cloves, crushed with garlic press
I am blessed to have many defining moments in my life and my son, Jacob was followed by two daughters, both of them unique and fill our home and hearts with love and laughter - parenting is the most amazing experience and I am blessed to be sharing it with my fabulous DH who loves us all! It can take us through such an array of emotions in moments - but there is nothing that compares with it!! I am blessed with my three children - they have taught me and continue to teach me so much about myself, life and love!! They make my life wonderful!!!
1 dullards
Now, what about corporate businesses where there is always a gatekeeper in your way? Well, your first contact should be with the gatekeeper since we can get extremely valuable information from him/her such as the target person’s name, who their current carrier is and x-date, among other things. But, now you want to get through the gatekeeper and get to the decision maker, right? So, when do you call? My suggestion is to call anytime the gatekeeper is away from his/her desk which would be during lunch hour, before 9am and after 5pm. Generally decision makers will have much longer office hours then their receptionists and you will have a better shot at catching them at that time.
Pharh murli O Rañjhiya, kadh koi teekhi taan
01 Bud Alzir - Morocco (4:39)
10-Niney Holness-Wipe Away
I found that you not only can use them for those cool dots, but you can also paint with them! I embossed the above butterfly (Kaizercraft Bonjor collection stamps. One of my faves!!) with some black embossing powder on plain white CS and on the bird I embossed with brown embossing powder and colored it as well (From the same collection as mentioned above). Then squirted some out on my splat mat and painted it. You can also just mist a little water on it and lighten the color up. I did this on another project that I did, that I am going to show you. Added dots here and there. I also added them on the swirls and lace too! Now for my whole tag!
(Steve+Alex)Olson = Prolific, Genius or Insane? You decide, either way if you’re not there, you’ll wish you were. The latest installation to the Known Gallery in Los Angeles is a father-son match up that’s going down in the history books. BOOM BOOM will not disappoint. Head over to Alex’s Blog for a little taste of his style and then check out the coverage of Steve’s last show, Menage a Trois, with Stecyk and Melanie Berry. Mix those two and who knows. See you there.
Abraham Darby
Our puppies are up – Buddy got up early and got me up early. He’s now sleeping with Jim on our bed. They have such a rough life!
Saturday’s gathering follows one crushed by police last July, when 1,600 people were arrested.
what are you reading and knitting this week?
For three years now I’ve struggled to grow decent carrots and this year I think I’ve finally cracked it and defeated my arch nemisis of the veg world!
“My speech,” I explained, “has been corrupted by English novelists.”
effort and I know that good families just do not happen without work.
The poll lead has more than halved, has all but disappeared in the Sunday Times this morning and there have been enough polls this week to suggest that this is not a freak. Momentum, unbelievably, is with Labour. Failure to beat this lot, as unpleasant, dishonest and incompetent as they are, would be an epic achievement. But don't let the Tories tell you that it is very difficult to unseat a ruling party, that the odds are stacked against them because of flaws in the Boundary Commission, that the message is clear but hasn't been put across well enough, yadda yadda....
I know that the shimmer in these blushes looks a bit severe in photos, but it is not over the top once you have it on. It adds a nice glow without making you look frosty or glittery. The pigmentation of these blushes are great; the texture is a touch powdery when you apply it and your palette will get a bit messy, but in the end it is worth it as these apply quite nicely.
Andrew Lessing.
Just remember to be eligible for entry into the prize draw you must use at least one item that is available from the shop and link to this post on your blog.
Invictus
Ok, so if any of you B&Bs (blogging bakers/baking bloggers) have made a rainbow cake or attempted to make one, I would LOVE to hear your story and see any pics that you may have.
Cloud computing is all about distributing your process across multiple CPU and running them in parallel or concurrently. Current programming languages are not very well suited for that.
Hand sculpted from papier maché,
It’s turned out that I am really bad at this communication thing. The goal of letting my voice out has stalled. How long has it been since I sat down and told my daily story?
“I said ‘what are you doing here?’” said Keenan, “and he said ‘What are YOU doing here?’ We both laughed.”
“Now more than ever, as the role of memory in our culture erodes at a faster pace than ever before, we need to cultivate our ability to remember. Our memories make us who we are.”
20 House of Blues, Myrtle Beach, SC
Knowing You means all my troubles are light and momentary.
I repeat - I approve the arraignment of Mladic - but should he be tried alone?
I won’t bore you with the details but my Laptop is very broken at the moment and my hubby is trying to fix it for me. I feel so very lost without it and I’ve got very behind in keeping up with all the lovely blogs I follow. I can view them all in Google reader on my phone but, it’s too difficult to look at anything for too long on a 3.5 inch screen!
After this trip, when came home, he looked up at me, looked down, up again, gulped and said:
Hello? Are you still here? I wouldn't blame you if you weren't.
That's bliss for me. Peace, quiet, velvety darkness; just me, a candle and a good book. Suddenly reading becomes an even deeper pleasure than usual. I rather hoped the power cut would go on for hours.
Growing inequality in labor compensation played a major role in increasing income inequality between the top 1 percent and the rest of the population from 1979 to 2007. Over the period, however, both the growing inequality in business income, including income from small firms, partnerships and S corporations, and in capital income in the form of dividends, interest and capital gains, as well as the rising share of these forms of income in household income, played a more significant role, especially after 2000.
Now I have to go cool down, and enjoy my thanksgiving holiday.
Duna had her own umbrella and as usual sat quietly except when she dragged the whole thing behind her in an attempt to get at Bonnie.
Last summer Scott Schwister, Frank Hernandez, and I held the first Edcamp Minnesota at Hamline University with East Metro Integration District 6067 as our sponsor. We got such great feedback from that event that it was clear we had to do another one. Scott and I began planning (mostly Scott on this one) last fall and got East Metro Intermediate District 916 to host and sponsor it. Unbeknownst to us, Tom Brandt and Lisa Sjogren from the Osseo School District were also busy planning an edcamp in Brooklyn Park. So, Minnesota teachers have two opportunities to make it to an Edcamp. EdcampMSP in Brooklyn Park on June 2nd and EdcampMN on June 20th in Little Canada.
Any further instructions Brulee had were cut off when an arrow entered their tent between the two of them. Crème backed away as Brulee took the opportunity to charge forward. The draenei glowed with the power of the holy Light as she charged force with a battle cry.
Hello, I apologise now for I won't be posting for about a week because I will be going to Byron Bay up in Queensland. However, I will try to share some photos of the beautiful scenery there! :)
I graduated from college magna cum laude.
The climactic battle is very cool for the time period and low budget. Murder uses Madeleine to attempt to kill Neil, but she is stopped by Bruner. It is not said, but his Christianity gives him an edge against the devilish voodoo. Good thing, too, because he and neil pursue Madeleine right into Murder’s zombie army. Bruner knocks murder out, which releases his hold on them so they run off a cliff like lemmings. But the rules of cinema dictate two things; the villain must die and the love birds must be reunited. Since the Christian Bruner cannot kill Murder, (Heh.) Beaumont rebels and throws Murder and himself off the cliff. Murder’s death (Heh, part deux.) not only un-zombifies Madeleine, but brings her bsck to life. The Christian Bruner has no comment on the spiritual implications, so I suggest just going along with it.
As for The Lord of The Rings, I saw all three films at the theatre as they came out. I rarely go to movies but these were a must-see for me. I’ve read the books more times than I can count, and while no movie adaptation is ever perfect, this one comes very close.
It makes me angry to think that he can say those words the first time and it’s supposed to magically make me not angry.. The first time he says it, is to soothe me over. That makes me wonder if he actually does mean it. Its okay. I can take it..
Yup, that’s all for the bragging (haha just kidding)
Read your story “Holy Spirit” or “The Holy Spirit Comes” by Jill Kemp
Starting today, I have moved to my new WordPress site: http://sweatywrites.com/ where I would reside from here on forward. I would greatly appreciate it if you would kindly follow me there and subscribe to the new RSS feed (as the new site has a different feedburner address).
The Four String Quartets
Catholic leaders threaten to deny politicians the right to communion if they disagree with the church hierarchy, without acknowledging that there is a major divide on the issue of abortion among the most faithful Catholics.
I’m sure I’ve forgotten a lot of details. The camera is made out of 1×4′s from Home Depot; the skeleton of it. Then it’s wrapped in 3 mil black plastic to make it dark. It’s really creepy to be inside of it, like being inside the stomach of a whale, but with a red safelight.
Well, when they make a movie about a black woman they'll be sure to cast an appropriate actress. Cleopatra was, of course, Greek. (Or, rather, Macedonian - a descendant of Alexander's general, Ptolemy.)
“You are so full of shit.” She bent down, grabbed her bag, and held it in front of her like a life preserver. “What signals?”
5. Cut into cubes about 1/3 - 1/2 inch. (I use a 'Vidalia Chop Wizard' to create the cubes by slicing the potato and placing it in the wizard and pushing it through - be SURE that the potatoes are partially cooked or the wizard will not work. I love how quick and easy it makes the job. I imagine a french fry maker would be quick and easy as well.)
This month you also:
Here's my mosaic :
Stamped Image Wild Rose Studio - Bella With Flowers
I am finally getting around to creating a recipe binder. I have 20+ Cookbooks, hundreds of pages from magazines, and too many internet bookmarks. My goal is to try at least three new recipes each week and put the best into the binder with a picture of the completed dish (Prince Charming hates cookbooks without pictures). Throughout the week I will post any recipes that made the cut and link them up here.
Mary, Contrary: Our garden got transplanted to our new home. And our shallots have taken off like rockstars.
A new central control room is being established at Heathrow to mobilise teams of border staff at terminals where queues may be beginning to build up.
Being denied food and water made me get a terrible headache and stomachache. I told the nurse my concerns and she told me to take Nubain, which is a pain medication. I told her I really didn't want medications, but she said it would take my stomachache away. At this point it was getting bad so I agreed. The medication made it all worse. Instead of a stomachache I now felt like I was horribly drunk, and I'm not a drinker. I couldn't focus on anything and I couldn't stop swaying my head.
Thank you, Poochie-Pie!
Mr Cull said he was not alarmed by the level of debt, and believed the issues Dunedin faced could be addressed. “Headroom” created by lower debt levels was important.
BECAUSE I'M WHITE: Would-be refugee Brandon Carl Huntley
What if there was at least one language that was spoken, read, written and understood all over the world? It would bring the world so much closer. You could go to any remote corner of the planet and find someone to talk to. Imagine the impact it would have on education, training, technology, employment and development. A volunteer in China could offer Biology lessons to poor children in rural Uganda over the internet. Everyone could read the works of great authors. It would open up access for all sections of society in every country to a world of possibilities. It would be a world where everyone would be on equal footing. There would be no funny or awkward instances of ‘lost in translation’. Korean restaurants would not offer to serve Oriental ‘cousins’. Anyone could become a global citizen, a person of the world, able to work and be understood anywhere. Maybe local languages would become irrelevant and gradually fade into oblivion.
That question leads to an answer to a different question. My fiancée. I’ve never shied away from cuddling with her and leaning on her in cramped seating, or always holder her hand, or putting my arm around her as we walked through downtown Toronto during our courtship. Somewhat surprising to both of us on our second date before we’d kissed or done anything but had outstandingly lively conversations over drinks, I proceeded to put my arm around her as we walked away from the SkyDome after a Jays game. Seeing as I don’t like contact with other people and I did this without a thought or hesitation, it must’ve meant that my gut knew something long before my mind. This Friday is our 5th Anniversary.
Little King’s Story is a strategy, life simulation and RPG all rolled into one. You play as the little king who works with his advisers to dominate the world, snatching land from seven other kings. The little king only has a really lame staff attack though so needs men and women of many talents to aid him on his way. You start with a tiny kingdom and must venture out into the unknown with an army of troops looking for things to kill, loot to steal and kings to squash. With money you can improve the kingdom and unlock new classes to train your citizens up with and slowly but surely the world becomes your own.
Let’s compare, as to historical significance, Wilson’s much-discussed Washingtonian Society of a century before A.A.’s founding. Society membership, said Wilson, “passed the hundred thousand mark,” but, said he, it lost sight of its goal of helping alcoholics. It became embroiled in Abolition and Temperance matters, quickly faded from the scene after only a few short years of activity, and had been long dead for a good many decades before A.A. was founded (See Wilson’s remarks quoted in Pass It On. NY: Alcoholics Anonymous World Services, Inc., 1984, pp. 325, 354, 366-367; Twelve Steps And Twelve Traditions. NY: Alcoholics Anonymous World Services, Inc., 1952, pp. 178-179). Furthermore, several perspicacious AAs were later to write that the real failure of the Washingtonian movement was its non-reliance on God and focus on temperance pledges.
I hope you enjoy this brief excerpt from
Sounds good to me! I always change things around.
Ang: I have them in my office.
Nifty, Aye?
The crisis with the US economy and the dollar system, the conduct of the US foreign policy is all a part of breakdown of the entire superpower structure that was built up after the end of WWII, claims Engdahl. “Nobody in Washington wants to admit, just as nobody in Britain a hundred years ago wanted to admit that the British Empire was in terminal decline,” claims the author, noting that “All of this is related to the attempt to keep this sole superpower not only intact, but to spread its influence over the rest of the planet.”
What Reviewers Are Saying:
* harass me about imagined affairs
It is amazing the amount of time that can be lost so quickly to the distraction of all sorts of electronic devices. Yes… That includes computers (blogs). :)
Sometimes they noticed a problem, and ended up adding a layer of insulation to a kitchen pipe during a cold spell, or closing a window in advance of a threatening storm.
7. The war on drugs has been waged primarily in communities of color where people of color are more likely to receive higher offenses.According to the Human Rights Watch, people of color are no more likely to use or sell illegal drugs than whites, but they have higher rate of arrests. African Americans comprise 14 percent of regular drug users but are 37 percent of those arrested for drug offenses. From 1980 to 2007 about one in three of the 25.4 million adults arrested for drugs was African American.
TEATIME STORIES FOR MOTHERS (Honor/River Oak 2001)
—the tidings, namely, that man is no longer outlawed, nor cast out of the kingdom of God, but is once more a son, once more in the station assigned to him by his God, inasmuch as along with the first-fruits of humanity the lump also is hallowed.
Lady Gaga never fall short of surprising us. The pop phenomenon surprises us all this time with a controversial free music video, while we were expecting otherwise, especially taking into account the video’s religious-driven concept.
Anyway, I reviewed some of the immigration paperwork I had stacked up. It looks like I’ll be seeing the lawyers again on Friday. YAY! I have the money this time. It’s $420 that has to be paid to the “U.S. Department of Homeland Security” for the I-130 form for petition of relative. My brother paid me that amount for helping with the wedding videos and with his IRS files. I’ll explain more of what that immigration form is later. There’s just too much shit to explain in one sitting. Immigration laws are so ugh, how do you say, always changing and indefinitely unpredictable? Illogical? Aggressive, inward or outward? Difficult to read? They’re worse than a borderline! Actually, I shouldn’t even compare and insult my fellow borderlines. ANY borderline would be more reasonable than these outrageous laws!
This first was regarding clothes. During Summer School I had very little time or brain space to work out clothing. I would go to the gym first thing then race home, have breakfast, get dressed and go. So I would have everything organised the night before, on a hanger in dressing order. This saves so much time that it's just the way I do things now. As soon as I've trialled my outfit, it goes on the hanger and into the wardrobe, with the shoes for Tuesday on the left, Wednesday's shoes on the right. Earrings, necklace and belt get hooked over the hanger.
Orchestrated by Grandpa’s index finger,
See them smiling
Meanwhile, here’s the proclamation signed by Gov. Mary Fallin:
How many swords must go through my heart
Truth is I did try, but I fell, as I got dizzy in the thin air up in the Swiss mountains, and my throat was so dry from all the goings on, that my voice had a growling husky tone that Smokey Robinson would have envied.
* paid actor is not actually a Navy SEAL Astronaut Lawyer.**
So what grants are available to writers? Are they impossible to receive? Your eligibility can depend on who you are, what you are writing, where you live, how long you've written, what you've published, where you were born, your financial need and even mobility. What you won't find is a one-stop shop where mysterious people hand out money to new writers. What you will discover is that a writer with a clear-cut plan and serious motivation has the best chance at finding funds for a project. The following examples should open your eyes.
"I know you've dealt with wolves before,
In robes of victory through the skies,
7. Super Friends: (First aired 1973, ran until 1986) The Super Friends were an animated group of superhero comrades. The show was based on the Justice League of America--a fictional superhero team that appeared in then-recent comic books. During its 13 year span, the show existed under several different titles, all involving some combination including the words 'super' and "friends.' Plotlines for the show focused on the often far-fetched schemes of mad scientists and aliens, who were eventually revealed to be well-intentioned but pursuing their goals through unlawful means. Typically, each episode would end with the Super Friends convincing the antagonsits to adopt more reasonable methods. The Super Friends and the Justice League of America were merely the animated embodiment of the "justice for all" atmosphere that cloaked the nation at that time.
But true love don’t come along every day
Other Shells: 3rd – soft suede, 2nd - soft suede (1 x stamp off), and 1st – crumb cake (1 x stamp off)
After they went home I did laundry and packaged an e-bay sale. I took it to the post office and stopped at the fresh meat market on the way home to pick up some fresh beef since my freezer is all defrosted and cleaned out.
d) verbal abuse
Studio Creations is a drop-in art-making activity for families and is free with paid admission to the Museum. Studio Creations is offered on Saturdays and Sundays (with some exceptions) from 1:00-3:30 p.m. All supplies are provided.
Appearace: Excellent clarity, light straw color (lighter than the picture above suggests). White head with some lacing.
As per my usual, what went into the pan did not quite line up with the recipe. Still, what came out produced a more than acceptable salvage job — especially when paired with a rum-heavy reinterpretation of a ginger beer cocktail. Both recipes make use of fresh lime, and follow.
1 legible
It's been a while since I posted anything beer-related. A combination of (thankfully unfounded) health concerns and the beast of a project we've undertaken has meant little thought has been applied to tasting beer for the past half year, so it's about time the taste buds were exercised again.
So why set deadlines for ourselves? Here are my thoughts:
I mean with the advent of the Internet, it became more and more easy to get the stuff you’re searching for, even on physical supports, directly from the label at half the price it’s sold in retail shops that their expensive costs and mall-like practices kills them. I don’t know the price the Kaotoxin releases are sold in (large) retail stores, but I’m pretty sure it’s at least four times the wholesale price I’m selling them to my distributor. What’s the point? Anybody can order them directly from the Kaotoxin web store or my retail distributors’ ones for half the price, shipping costs included.
A woman is someone who has to be patient – when the man she is with has to place her after work and friends on his to-do list.
So, for the next while, I'll be helping care for my new friend. I'll try and make time during the week to visit and comment your b-logs. Thanks for being so patient and understanding, you guys are the best!
5. Back to the Future’s DeLorean time machine is actually a licensed, registered vehicle in the state of California. While the vanity license plate used in the film says “OUTATIME,” the DeLorean’s actual license plate reads 3CZV657.
Sent: Monday, March 26, 2012 9:52 PM
1/3 cup fruity white wine
Low fat sour cream, optional
An exhibition that I’m really looking forward to seeing is David Nash at Kew – A Natural Gallery. Well-known for carving wood with chainsaws, Nash can currently be seen working at Kew Gardens (in a ‘Wood Quarry’) creating pieces for the exhibition using trees that have come to the end of their natural life. The exhibition (opening 9 June) includes sculptures, installations, drawings and film, on show throughout the Gardens, glasshouses, and exhibition spaces. Kew Gardens
“Sophisticated but at the same time dramatic and seductive, Tangerine Tango is an orange with a lot of depth to it,” said Leatrice Eiseman, executive director of the Pantone Color Institute®. “Reminiscent of the radiant shadings of a sunset, Tangerine Tango marries the vivaciousness and adrenaline rush of red with the friendliness and warmth of yellow, to form a high-visibility, magnetic hue that emanates heat and energy.”
While on their way to the scene, authorities came into contact with 50-year-old Juan Arellano. He was carrying a 16 oz. can of Natural Ice beer.
Another interesting case and a cliffhanger that I’m dying to find out about. This show is very good ’till now and I bet that it will stay good for the rest of its run too.
So, it seems to have settled in nicely, being reasonably busy on my 3 visits (less last night, but that was a Monday). And I am taking Davefromtshop their tonight so hopefully I will have the opportunity to delve in to the citrus delights of a Dark Star Revelation once more.
People don’t be deceived by the adversary. If you worry, then are you truly trusting God at His promises? Think about it. I am not your judge just a faithful servant. As humans, we can’t escape being wounded and experiencing a broken heart. It is okay to feel overwhelmed, but not consumed with fear. Fear is not of God but of the adversary, right? God has not abandoned us, it is us who moves away from God’s protection. It is us who doubt so quickly and easily. We are human, sure! But we are children of a King. Does that not mean anything to you?
Crackers seem intimidating, but they are SUPER easy. The only thing you have to be careful is to watch them in the oven. This is not a walk-away kind of baking. Luckily, the short baking time means you really didn’t have a chance to go anywhere anyway.
A vote for any Republican from this generation is vote against everyones best interests. I'd say, "go ahead and vote for one of these yahoos so you can see for yourself", but the stakes are too high. Such an attitude would ultimately affect me, too, and so it is with great urgency that I encourage one and all to educate yourself on all these issues....before Bachmann has her way, killing the Department of Education.. and you'll be forced to educate yourself and your children on your own.
Precipitous in places. And you need to check the tide-tables before descending, because the tide comes in all the way to the cliffs, get caught in the wrong place and ummmm. well, not a good idea, anyway.
They say: “Shutter Sisters is a collaborative photo blog that believes in the transformative power of telling stories through photography. We support any and all creative projects that encourage women to use their cameras in a way that empowers them and expresses who they are. Committing to shoot at least a photo a day for a whole year is an engaging and fun challenge that keeps participants tapped into their creativity, cameras in hand.”
so that's why things have been a bit quiet around here, in case anyone noticed!
To make these 2-ingredient muffins, you mix one box of chocolate cake mix with one 15-ounce can of pureed pumpkin. That’s it. The recipe sounded odd, but I gave it a try anyway. The muffins seemed on the heavy side for me, and I thought it would work better in smaller bites, which is why I adapted it into today's fudge brownie-like drop cookie.
Cashier said, 'I'm sorry, but you don't have enough
In either case, I hope to see some progress from our male middle distance corps, because it’s been some time since we’ve been on the podium in either event in Olympic competition. Our last medal over 800 came in 1992, when AR holder Johnny Gray took bronze in Barcelona. And, believe it or not, we haven’t medaled over 1500 meters at the Games since Jim Ryun’s silver medal WAY back in 1968! So we have a lot of work to do in 2012.
A big welcome to my new followers, and apologies for my lack of visits and comments to your own blogs. I will try and catch up with you all this week.
Till the next post then.
P.S. Today would have been Jack Kerouac's birthday. You might think me mad (I won't refute it), but, sometimes, I feel as though he's here and we silently talk. Today, I touched a book of his poetry and... I started to cry. I heard him say, "You can cry a thousand tears, sweetie, and it's still going to be just perfect."
Of course, from what I can tell she started with a junior petite version. I should be so lucky…
From the cover: This book puts at the disposal of the home handyman all the skills and techniques so painstakingly acquired and refined by master craftsmen in the work of a lifetime. In 700 tips and hints for so long trade secrets builders, carpenters, decorators, electricians, plumbers and other experts show how they go about their jobs. Even the most experienced handyman will discover new ways to save time, money and labour. The novice enthusiast will learn the professional way to tackle jobs in and around the home.
It wasn’t until I was in high school that I actually had an outfit that was bought at a store. My mom sewed clothes for us. And it was the hand-me-downs from my aunts, who were just a few years older than me. And the charity clothes.
I think I believe inspiration is everywhere. Well, some days it is. And nowhere on other days. It just depends. Am I open to it? Am I looking for it?
A little recap of what I wrote on Friday:
There you have them the creatures of other worlds as come to life in the scientific imaginations of the experts. Perhaps in centuries to come, man will span the vast reaches of the universe and at long last come face to face with his neighbors in space.
I write about reality, all kinds of reality, reality as it seems to me. My lovely Mum battled Alzheimer’s for six years and my wife Robina and I looked after her to the end – she died in June 2010. As her memory faded I decided to write a poem telling the story of her life, to help her remember who she was, from a council-house upbringing in Gravesend to Bletchley Park during the war to singing Elgar at the Royal Festival Hall to going on tour with her punk poet son in Australia and Canada.
Ultimately, any individual can be defined as a corporation. I feel that free political speech is the most important kind of free speech. We need to shine the light on this dark corner of American politics. That is all.
Ripper
Many of the settings in his books are based on memories of where he’s been and places he has known.
After watching four strait hours of The National Parks, I went back into my collection of photos from my own trip to various National Parks (Badlands, Zion, Grand Canyon, Carlsbad Caverns) that I took last summer. It’s incredible how each photograph can stir up its own cocktail of emotions. I’m not even talking about just my own personal photographs, per se. There is an inordinate power that an image can have over the psyche, triggering nostalgia or excitement or desolation, even all simultaneously. This picture that I have posted in particular has a ghostly power over me. It was taken at Badlands National Park. As I remember, my friend Kevin and I were driving through the park, he pulled over his car at one of the many look-outs, I threw my camera out the open sunroof, snapped a one-handed picture and we kept driving. The shot was not thoughtful in the slightest. The road is completely in the way and I had to edit it so it would not appear slightly crooked. Even still, I am not really speaking to the composition of the photograph. No matter how careless it was shot, there is some way that this picture transfixes me; it might be the whisp of the clouds, or the shine in the grass, or the definition of the rock, or the idea of being on the road always, but this image sometimes appears as if it’s moving, and I have to really open my eyes. I have to remind myself that it is. Right this very second, those jagged hills exist, and it might be windy or raining, but whether I took this picture or not, they exist and this is exhilarating to me. I could get on a train or a bike right now and go see them. Better yet, I could walk. If I had a map, I could walk to Badlands and while it could take me weeks to get there, I have the choice to do that. I could walk out the door right now and be at this very place; it is waiting for me. That’s a serious thing to think about. -Tom
Upon prompting from the reporter, Ayalon explained the philosophy behind the proposal:
We are half way through the My Modern Muse series and I`m loving all the interviews and hope you are too. I still have some amazing ones coming up so thank you to everyone who has joined in.
Iris, for what it is worth, seems to have genuine gratitude to be here. This cat seriously will stand up on her hind legs to hug me. It's violently cute.
穿越高深的墙
when it is brought in a jug which is stopped fast, it expels the cork with such a retort, that one thinks a gun has gone off. They like to praise the English beer in the highest, but in my view it is rarely deserving of such praise.” It is mentioned in August von Kotzebue’s play Menschenhass und Reue (though the English rendition as The Stranger just says “Fetch us some ale”), and in 1801 the Jahrbücher der preußischen Monarchie can be found bemoaning that “the brewing trade in the towns has been universally suffering for 50 years due to the consumption of foreign beverages, tea, coffee, wine, Englisch Öl, etc.”
disposal of the Indians now in Town, we agree, that Roger Williams,
When glaze components are balanced to your liking and you are ready to bake your ham, preheat the oven to 275F and place the ham in a roasting pan with the fat side up. Pour glaze over the entire ham, using a pastry brush or similar to coat the whole surface and lifting ham up so that some of the glaze is in the pan underneath.
reciting verses in eruptive excitement
Anyway, with all this in mind, we can offer the following as a formalisation of the second stage of the Kalam argument:
In 1994, studio New Horizons gave the green light for a movie of the Fantastic Four, a story about four people who again, affected by cosmic radiation which gave them extraordinary super-abilities – Reed Richards’s body became super stretchy giving him the ability to stretch his body at will, Johnny Storm had the ability to turn the entire surface of his body alight at will and also gained the ability of flight, Sue Storm gained the power of invincibility and was able to project force fields, and Ben Grimm’s body became solid and rock-like, giving him incredible strength but radically altering his appearance. The movie was Directed by Oley Sassone and starred Alex Hyde-White(Reed Richards/Mr Fantastic), Jay Underwood(Johnny Storm/The Human Torch), Rebecca Staab(Susan Storm/The Invisible Woman), Michael Bailey-Smith(Ben Grimm/The Thing), Joseph Culp(Victor Von Doom/Dr Doom). The cast and crew were unaware that the it was being made as a stalling tactic and never intended to be released, as the rights would have lapsed back to Marvel from the studio if it did not begin production of a Fantastic Four movie by a certain date. Again, footage from this has now surfaced online.
Yes, I write about food sometimes, but I’ve never asked for anything, never sought anything free. I also don’t expect anyone to care about anything I write. I tend to write about experiences, about those moments where food makes a memory, where it intersects with life in a beautiful, inextricable way, for better, for worse or for the simple pleasure of one wonderful bite. I write about time, I write about people. I write for me, and maybe for the handful or people who might read these words. When I have a meal or a moment that hits me, makes me feel something, I’m compelled to spend some time the next day thinking through why it made me feel that way. Like last night, even though the food wasn’t astoundingly noteworthy, the meal still was. It kept me up that night thinking, wondering, why had it bothered me (and the industry people I befriended) quite so much. And through writing and thought I have the benefit of a conclusion. Yes, I have a blog. Yes I write about food. But this doesn’t make me a food blogger. I think I can call myself a food writer, even if the only place my words end up are right here, on this blog.
Let’s see. . . I’ve worked to find a primary care doctor for my parents who actually listens and acts (found one). I’ve worked to get good daily personal care for my parents (ongoing). I’ve worked to get appropriate and effective communication from the management of the personal care nursing service (not there yet). I’ve worked to get therapy that helps my parents (got some – ongoing). I’ve worked to get and keep my parents’ finances in order (ongoing). I’ve worked to make sure my parents’ bills are paid (ongoing). I’ve worked to fix mess-ups by Medicare (not there yet).
Beer Log: And a half hour later
So where else did he expect me to go?
ME: Is there anything you hope your current work evolves into?
Now to the fun part. Cut patterned papers to make the card pretty. Dont forget to put some on the back side of the card, it will show when you fold it. Here is the template for the patterned paper pieces.
I'm lucky that a kind, lovely author decided to pop her head up above the parapet and explain to me what my actions looked like from outside my little Crusader on the Side of Right bubble. And I hope that by withdrawing the giveaway and telling you that no more entries will be offered in return for votes, I can show everyone that I understand how very dim I was, and that I'm sorry.
Planginga’s definition of diction includes not only pronunciation, but also word choice and, he states, “from the masters of it blessings flow.”
At first we had it all to ourselves, and we simply enjoyed the parading party peeps. We asked the passersby to identify themselves. We maybe asked them very loudly, with my husband patenting a voracious battle cry of IDENTIFY YOUR CHARACTER! whenever a costumed kook walked by. A young couple joined us, and the boy knew everything about every one of the characters that came along. It was such good fun, he was a bona fide carrier of a cool card in this environment, giving us all the history and battle tales we could ever seek about each hybrid freak that crossed our path. The more we drank, the more curious we grew. Answer man knew it all.
I was destined to live in San Francisco based on one of the earliest stories I remember from my childhood. My dad and his brother-in-law took a day trip to the city when I was a toddler, and when reporting to my mom about their activities of the afternoon, decided to freak her out.
love, freedom and glory,
Speaking of “personal debt”, we learned from our research that the
“Perhaps you should tell me your secret now”
A little after 2 am, the all-too-familiar "Code Blue" rang out over our intercom system. These night shift codes mean two things in my Radiology world: will the patient need a Radiology exam to solve the mystery of their code and how long will I be able to do chest compression this time?
Publication Date: December 2012
Our 4 season room houses one of my Longaberger baskets and an older aluminum pitcher collect my corks. You could use almost anything if you save corks as I do. Maybe it's time to stop saving them, but then.......again, what harm in keeping corks? I use that line a lot in justification, what harm, or better yet, I could be doing worse things.
Irwin, however, uses the schema of the title in his work, letting those colors exists in order in the gallery, Red, Yellow, then Blue in a group of three large panels above and matching below on the floor. Irwin’s work seems mindful, however, of human involvement in an architectural space, fully opening up inquiry of perception in a full 3D and lived in realm. You might say his homage to Newman comes post Richard Serra. I could not help but think of the works other direct precedent Serra’s Delineator 1974/75, a work which induces a dizzying effect of weight and mass on the gallery goer.
And killed my heart as he walked away
Well--wait, no--actually my first exposure to Small was seeing a low-budge video on the local access or university channel while at my grandmother's house in Raleigh, and I'm looking for that video on YouTube sans success. I recall it was a music video show, though I don't remember the name. I do, however, remember the following show was called "Club Mix" and a cheap Waterlilies promo canned my attention from there. Weird I can remember that bit of it. Any help, folks?
"On October 31st, 2011, disaster struck the tiny island of Hilton Head, South Carolina. Twenty-one notorious characters descended upon Hilton Head and went wild shooting everything in sight.
Socks 4 Life kindly provided me with a $25 Gift Card to do a little bit of sock shopping on their site. While shopping in the womens section I noticed just how affordable they really are. I found a 3 pack of Julietta Women's Super Low Cut Socks on sale for only $3.95, and since I'm such a lil bargain shopper , I decided to get two packs of them. Although their were plenty of other fun tempting prints that caught my eye, I decided to be safe and go with a plain color that would match anything. Not only that, but I love that they are super low cut, because I hate when my socks show when I am wearing shorts or capris, and these type of socks defiently prevent that from happening.
I was recently involved in a Carnegie shadowing event, where children were discussing the books that were shortlisted for the Carnegie prize.
So I have created a new fresh completely different website!! So my blog posts from now on will be posted here: www.imagesbycassandra.com/blog/
“I know I shouldn’t be saying this, but I kind of want her to get voted off so I can sign her,” Akon said. “She’s beyond the talent that’s supposed to be there. I think she’s overqualified, I really do.”
Nonetheless, Fascism was subversive in that it fought against the traditional Italian ruling elite -- who were essentially still 19th century liberals (what would nowadays be called "neo-liberals" or just "conservatives"). It was also subversive because of its desire to innovate in many ways and to replace the existing ruling class with a new Fascist ruling class.
There always seems to be a section in every big market I’ve been to in Mexico selling an array of colorful piñatas.
I placed my head at the feet of the goddess and wept.
Oh--wait--here's the slide show with his girlfriend, I mean dollfriend, I mean--er--uh--oh, never mind.
Judge # 3 -- Warning! Danger! Keep this out of the reach of children. I'm not sure what I'm supposed to taste besides pain. I had to wave off two people who
The presenter will be Clementina van der Walt of the Western Cape who will give a slide show and talk “To Buy or not to Buy” – the value of making and collecting studio ceramics in the 21st century.
There's a new blog in the Middle East blogosphere, and it looks like it's off to an impressive start. It's called Arms Control and Regional Security in the Middle East, and it's about, well, what do you think it's about with that title? It's run by Bilal Y. Saab and Chen Kane, both of the James Martin Center for Nonproliferation Studies of the Monterey Institute of International Studies. The initial articles are by the two of them but they also say they'll welcome outside contributors. Both are accomplished specialists in the field.
me: “You are the bloody navigator, tell me what to do!”
However, she said she would give EC Chairman Abdul Aziz Mohd Yusoff and his deputy, Wan Ahmad Wan Omar, the benefit of the doubt until the issue had been clarified.
Anyway, he proceeded on to tell me that all of the other Disney princesses were inferior, and in fact that most of them were pansies. Since he didn’t let me give my opinion I will choose now to point out that this is absolutely preposterous. Many, if not all of the Disney ladies are awesome. Yes, some of them are a little more on the girlie side. But my personal opinion is that being girlie isn’t the same thing as being weak. In fact, sometimes it’s just what does the trick.
take my hand
Yesterday morning I woke up at 6 am to the alarm
Happily, the enthusiastically named Welsh god Illtyd (which apparently translates as “Lord of Everything”) was so pleased we were making the effort to visit that he smiled beneficently on us, providing not only a free car parking space next to the pier in Penarth, but also a good few hours of rainlessness and some flavoured frozen dairy products in a carbohydrate-based
Please identify the investors of Tiger Management, Morgan Creek Asset Management, Julian Robertson and any other companies controlled by plaintiff, and state the amount of revenue or income received by plaintiff from such investments. Also please include the time when investors entered into plaintiff's investment program and when the investors left the program.
Dr. Richard
Thursdays 8pm-dark
Bench Press - 4 Sets of 12 reps with 46.5kg
Darian Frey is the captain of the Ketty Jay, who is quite the sordid ne'er-do-well to the nth degree. Frey's only cares are that he own the Ketty Jay and that no other may posses or even pilot her. His crew has been a revolving door for years, where few of stayed or lived long enough to decide if they want to stay. The ship's doctor is a drunk. The mechanic a virtual mute. The Ketty Jay also has two out-fliers, which are smaller aircraft that provide support, reconnaissance, and much needed gun power on their run, but they are piloted by a very loathsome young man and another who is so war-beaten he can't part with his ship. There is also a mysterious passenger with access to some very unusual science/magic, especially with his dutiful metal monstrosity at his beck and call. And not to forget their brand spanking new female pilot with a puzzling pass and a secret that could mean her ostracization at any moment. Each and every character is larger than life and grow on you more and more. The character's back stories were released a perfect points and really nailed where the character came from and the motivation or lack thereof for their current situation.
Houlihan is reborn, into a world of pain.
Asket agreed that I had to avoid going to a certain city at a certain day and time, not too far from now.
Doesn’t that make you feel special?
Credit: NOAA, SOSUS
I'd be lying if I said I didn't miss you. I miss you incredibly. The beautiful mornings we woke up to Frank Sinatra in the background and the sleepy nights we slept to Norah Jones's songs playing on your phone...the holding hands and kissing and love making... At times I think I want to just let you go. But then some memory of our time together creeps into my head. The time we spent walking in the art museum in Amsterdam..or that cold night we walked the streets of Paris with your arms around my shoulders. You standing among the crowd in the airport...waiting for me with a smile on your face. The taste of your lips when we kiss for the first time after months being apart. The look on your face when we said goodbye as I boarded the train. You muttered the words 'I'll miss you...' with a helpless look on your face...and tears were streaming down mine. Our walks by the river...in the park...at night. Sitting close and talking to you in that crowded, cramped American restaurant...with their lamp dangling so close to our heads and the very loud music...but I felt so close to you then. And all our other kisses, sometimes not really caring who saw us. Those passionate kisses. God.
In the past, we have used this Reading Raffle idea as part of our Dr. Seuss celebration in March. We host a Bookworm Party in celebration of Dr. Seuss~ you can find more info about the Bookworm Party here. (on TpT)
I am a pain in the ass.
Release Date : 6 November 1971
This is what I saw:
On Sunday, we were able to head south to Kokomo to visit Steph’s grandma and celebrate Thanksgiving with her. We had a good meal and a great time seeing her; it has been awhile since she’s been able to see Levi in person, but she’s been one of his strongest supporters since day one. We love you grandma, and it was so nice to spend the day with you. We are happy that it’s a short work week; later this week we will head down to celebrate Thanksgiving with Steph’s family, then down to my family after that. We are all looking forward to the Thanksgiving holiday. It has always been my favorite. In my mind, it seems to be the last pure holiday. I know the crazy shopping commences the day after, and some families seem to jump right over it to get to the craziness of Christmas quicker, but maybe that’s why I like it so much. The day is what it needs to be. It’s a day set aside to give thanks for who you are, who you’re with, what you have, and where you’re going. It’s about family, community, and reflection. Add in a great meal and spice it with a little football, and there you have it. The perfect holiday. And I thank God that I can spend it with my family complete.
An explosion sent three different scout groups flocking to the lower east district of the zone. There were fliers and runners and drivers pushing and shoving, trying to be the first ones there to pick up the pieces. Scavengers. Little bitch scavengers.
Conservation Officer
Oh but theres more !!!!!! she been giging , busking and has lots of various acoustic sessions booked on Radio , plus one of her covers has been aired on radio too !!! its been totally manic !!!
Another great feature of the fitbit is that it is so small. This is one of the major reasons that I purchased it. I didn't want something bulky on my arm while I am working in the office. I wouldn't mind wearing something like that to the gym but when I am working I don't want everyone to see that I am wearing it. The fitbit can go in your pocket, on your belt or the waist of your pants or on your bra. I wear mine on my bra because I know that I won't lose it that way. It hooks right in the middle of your bra and no one can even notice that you are wearing it. At night I put it on the provided soft wrist band.
I called a few people and thought more about it. We have decided that, No, we do not want Max in life skills at this time. However, the principal is rather adamant he wants Max gone. The resource teacher told me that if I didn't make up my mind soon about life skills that the principal wanted another meeting. This was before we were sure BTW. I asked what the meeting would be about. She said the principal would say the placement where Max is currently is not fitting his needs, therefor trying to force him out.
In February 2011, we had 217 people take part before I closed the List, and many more who wanted to join. I made so many wonderful friends, and heard of some awesome connections and friendships being made between other writers. The new Group concept worked very well, and we saw Group interviews, get-to-know-you sessions, a Choose Your Own Adventure bloghop, among other things. The Challenges were again heaps of fun - I think we'll all remember the goldfish bowl flash fiction for a long time! And the Show Not Tell Challenge in April (linked with Arlee Bird's A-Z Challenge) was a ball of fun too!
Occasionally that single, defiant strand reappears in the same spot after I’ve yanked its adventurous predecessor, cursed it, waved it in my mirror and in my best Tony Montana voice yelled, “And let that be a lesson to your friends not to come round here!”
Yesterday, I decided I wanted to make some drawer/wardrobe smelly bags (sorry I don't know the official name for them but you get what I mean?) and figured that muslin would be perfect for them. They're good for the bath aswell if you hang one off the taps by the ribbon! I use 2tbsp porridge oats and a good pinch of dried chamomile flowers in mine because I have dry skin and eczema on my hands. This little pouch really helps that!
Blown Budgets:
Bold Cheats
Most importantly, my LillyBuggy is just the cutest!
music. . .Twinkle Twinkle Little Star
If you or your family is dealing with dementia, Alzheimer’s or memory loss and you need to plan for future care, contact the elder law attorneys at Dutton & Casey. We specialize in developing care plans based on your family’s specific needs and that address the challenges that come with long life, including how to provide and finance long-term care. Visit www.duttonelderlaw.com today or call (312)899-0950 to set up a consultation.
I’d be delighted to add you to the growing list of blog subscribers. To subscribe: just scroll back up, fill in your email address and click on the Sign Me Up button. You’ll get an email asking you to confirm your subscription … confirm and you will automatically receive a new story and recipe every week.
I said, "That's BUFFALO BILL! I'd know that voice anywhere!!!!"
Then I painted them in using a combination of tombow markers, sakura sparkle pens and US Artquest Stargazer's. FYI...all of these products were purchased at Pickle and with the exception of the magenta mesh I think they are all still around. Maybe we can get Kim to bring some of those FAB magenta papers back in stock {hint, hint}. Actually, I just popped over to their blog and OMG...such amazing things arriving that I think I'll have to swing by there this afternoon with my big wallet. I'm in need of some inspiration.
Proshot Vhs Unknown Gen To Dvd Clone Ntsc
The district court’s reliance on language in the specification to limit "a pre-soaked fabric roll" to a single roll is similarly unavailing. The phrase "disposed around and in
To say 'lone wolf' defies the facts but is easy for mass consumption rather than to tell people the truth, which is now in-line with his 'inasnity' label.
So after getting my New Years Grazia on Thursday for just £1 as I used the prior editions discount voucher, I was pleased to see my new purchases were totally inspirational for Grazias fashion feature-Denim's New Dawn:
It's that time of the week
4) SST Course- This course is done in about 4 days for Day classes or over 3 weeks for evening classes. You need to attend at least 75% of the classes in order to get a Certificate of Completion.
This week's colour combo at the Play Date Café is simply gorgeous! Love love love the mix of deep red, mustard and off blue!!! And as it is opened to any medium I decided to go for a layout.
Next, I understand that you spoke w/Dr. Yates & he explained that he ‘crunched the numbers’, which is true. However, he was never the originating lab that did the testing. He only verified the results. I’ve had those further verified w/forensic experts in CA. All of the DNA has been tested, retested thru multiple labs, 2 different countries. Not only do he and I match as half-siblings? He and I equally match and are related to Elvis’ 1st cousin on the Presley side. Furthermore, “Jesse” matches Elvis’ 1st cousin (by the same ratio) on the Smith side as well. To put it simply? The only living person, that’s a male that can match both sides of Elvis Presley’s family tree, is in fact, Elvis Presley – period. No one else is capable.
–Scott Addis
This little car has been the hit toy of the past few weeks! It also converts to a walker push toy. Right now she can only go backwards - so I've got a bit of teaching left to do!
Warriors are never the life of the party. They do not like to draw attention by talking about themselves or their accomplishments. A true champion never boasts, they are humble. They are not interested in small talk and speak only when they have something meaningful to say. When they speak their voices are steady but not loud, confident but not arrogant, bold but not disrespectful. They shake your hand with a nice grip (but not painful). They look at you in the eyes, and you feel an energy you cannot describe. These people practice the traditional martial arts, the way and shibumi. These people keep dignity, sincerity, humility, etiquette, perfection and character alive in the society as well as in the arts.
(ready made with the circle edging) and then put the "Happy Birthday"
And a footnote.. if we ever do get the power (we handed over) back from the politicians-bankers-lobbyists, it would be a good idea to learn from our mistakes for a change. Power corrupts, so no one should be given too much power. It’s simple, if you don’t have it, you can’t abuse it.
I watch as this bloke’s finger hovers over some sunken, silver key on his elaborate typewriter!
operated by a husband and wife team, we
There won't be any green beer or corned beef and cabbage for me today as I not only have to work, but I also have class until 10 pm. This got me thinking about the last time I truly celebrated the quarter of me that is Irish and I could not remember. So, I turned to my computer to see if I had any photos and luckily found a folder entitled "St. Patrick's Day 2007." Has it really been that long?
I'm glad I love my family over great benefits and pay. I'm so glad we're here to be with my family and watch the kids grow and be more a part of their lives. We also can't wait to raise our little family here.
"Hush hun. Sige lang. Just let it out. There will be another time," she said, comforting me.
— Yogi Berra
The nursery rhymes started. They quieted A for a moment.
-”hearing what?”
One of the reasons why most so-called diets fail is because of a psychological and behavioral flaw that many dieters have. We desperately want to believe the simple, comforting promises that diets make—that doing A always gets us B. Because once we see that A (eating wheat germ 24-7) doesn’t always equal B (the cover of Vogue), then we get frustrated and angry, and give in to the gods of cream-filled baked goods.
I will miss the real comments! Don't forget about me!
10:30 am – 12 noon MEA Business Meeting and Closing Remarks (all are welcome and encouraged to attend)
My belief is that there are no good/bad experiences. It’s just energy. Life goes on in spite of experiences, of us, of opinions, of thoughts, of feelings. We give ourselves so many explanations. It’s one of the first signs we are trying to prove something, and to give ourselves an excuse to hold onto our labels. Onto our stories.
Among my favorite types of climbing parties is the new trad climber. Rarer than a 1933 Double Eagle (I’m writing this from a coin show here, folks) is the n00b trad climber. Almost every new climber gets into sport and bouldering; trad has been relegated to the realms of the hard-core alpinist and longtime (think 20+ years here) old-school climber…and their students. Like my climbing partner…and me.
I’d found a big hardcover book called Native Nations a couple of years ago at a garage sale in my neighborhood before my house got foreclosed. It’s a black and white photo book that features tribes and indigenous cultures around the world over the history of photographic portraiture. It became my reference material, and while painting, when the Basquiat doc ended, I put on another documentary called Art & Copy, about the world of advertising, which was very interesting and compelling. Anywho, here is what came out after 3 and a half hours –
The award asks for seven things about you that you wouldn’t normally post. So, on that note:
275In seas of flame my plunging soul is drown'd,
The respondents also said they would leave the car at home if they could purchase car insurance on a pay-as-you-drive basis.
Do you have any picks from these images? Any passes?
Hjaltalín - Traffic Music
Skeeter: Shut the fuck up.
Have you ever been inconsistent? Have you ever experienced “falling off the wagon,” so to speak? Yes, of course, we all have one way or another.
In lieu of many ad and PR campaigns, the Coborns Plaza have yet to fill over half of their occupancy. Out of the 461 available rooms, 225 have been filled. And despite the current vacancy, Residential Life predicts that the number will rise to somewhere between 300 and 385 for next year.
- Alonzo Gee really impressed me, a very incorrect travelling call negated what would have been the monster dunk of the night. He will be stealing a ton of Casspi minutes, especially if the Israeli continues to play like he did tonight.
Cop: 'He's got the fucking Pope as a chauffeur!'
-Corey. Throws a boney taco party.
My sweet friend recently lent me her family's old cookbooks to peruse. I love the cookbooks, but my favorite thing is seeing which little slips of paper and newspaper clippings people stuff inside these old cookbooks. These are some of the greatest recipes in my family's cookbooks, so I made sure to copy down some of my friend's too! Here is a great one I found - enjoy!
But Orman prefers to view her accomplishments in a way that doesn’t involve money or fame. She believes that she has achieved her success because she has an unflagging self-belief, and this gives her the inner strength to fend off her critics as well. Orman views the concept of success as something everyone can enjoy, regardless of bank account or status in society.
It was agony. The bow was a recurve, which meant there were no pulleys to help ease the strain of holding back the string. A few more seconds and his arm would be shaking too much to take the shot. Gracefully, the buck, oblivious to their presence, turned and offered his side to them. Seth focused on the small circle just behind the front leg where a well placed arrow would pierce the heart and kill the deer within seconds.
The smell fills the air as I toss stripes of bell pepper into the pan, add a few chunks of hard cheese I found in the refrigerator, and pour eggs over it all.
It's been five years since Amy Pond last traveled with the Doctor, and when he lands in her garden again, on the eve of the birth of her first child, she finds herself facing a heartbreaking choice – one that will change her life for ever.
Be one of the first 35,000 to enter and we'll ship you the Straight Line sample trio + get a FREE salon styling session. Enter to win Straight Shampoo, Conditioner and Blow Dry (worth $89) - for smooth, frizz-free styles. (Please note: our sweepstakes is not accessible via mobile devices.) This offer is from their FaceBook page.
There is a need for this book. There is a need for teen girls to feel like they have someone to turn to.
Ok Ok for just a short peep yea? Mak isah really missed being with you all :D
Now, you could certainly say I’m biased towards males. I try not to be; but even if I am, who isn’t biased towards his own gender? And for that matter, who isn’t biased? No one, that’s who.
The Deity of Christ (Theology in Community Series) ed. by Christopher Morgan and Robert Peterson is a clear call amidst the often confusing voices claiming to present the Jesus of the Bible and history. Amidst the quagmire of the ‘everyone Jesus’ and in a world where Jesus has been reduced to my homey and ‘BFF’, this book brings us back to the center of Christology. This book draws us to one of the most foundational attributes of the Jesus Christ the Son of the living God – his deity.
Goats. Yeah.
One Nation ....(then he whispered) Under God
Below is the original photo. I asked a dear friend to take this photo for my art project and he obliged. The wind whipped through and before I could move hair out of my eyes, my friend pressed the shutter release. Perfect.
If we receive a promotion while we’re not ready physically or mentally, we might end up being in stress because our lack of competence. Or, an unfitting person receives an unexpected big amount of wealth and become what Indonesian call “OKB” (Orang Kaya Baru; new rich people). Because their mentality is still of a lower economy class, the wealth might end up wasted up on unnecessary things.
It's finally a new year!
Tonight we went out to dinner and when I got home at 7:30, something happened. I got into work mode! I painted the bathroom ceiling and trim, did all the dishes, washed the counters, and scrubbed the kitchen floor. Wow. What happened?
The first time I ever thought of suicide was when I was six years old. I thought of suicide every single day. The first time I realized that God was not there was when I was six years old. God still isn't there, but I no longer expect it either, which is a huge relief. Adults lie about God to children. God will fix everything. Nothing happens to you without a reason, and the reason I was given was that I was being punished. I was told to pray. I was told to ask God for forgiveness. That was supposed to fix everything. All it did was take the complaints out of their ears.
In the absence of agreement between ISPs and RHs the Minister of Commerce, who is responsible for IP legislation, has instructed Ministry of Economic Development officials, the Ministry responsible for the Intellectual Property Office, to undertake a review “to build on information gathered during ISP and RH negotiations on the Code, and to take account of industry and subscriber concerns”.
I'm getting ready to really kill it in 2012. Just you wait. Here's to many more shows, tours and hopefully some new venues in the Bay Area! Happy New Year!
Here’s a look at the new team!
Tuesdays = Yoga
When making these Nonnettes, I had not one, not two, not three, but four blog challenges in mind:
1/3 jar of vindaloo curry paste (I prefer Pataks)
Prismacolor Pencils
We ended up giving Jess back to the breeders too. Our son just wasn't bonding at all and my long awaited 30th Birthday present just turned out as a complete disaster and was ripping the family apart, rather than bring us together, the stress from all directions was becoming unbearable, and at one point my fiancé and I were arguing so much I nearly moved out!
Verdict: Stick to the bonbons (Alex swears by the organic peanut butter bonbons); it's what Vosges does best.
The hotel was clean and comfortable. For the next week or so we were able to move in and not have to lug suitcases in and out of rooms like we normally would on our schedule of one-nighters. We could actually cook meals and save money not eating in restaurants. For a short period I felt like I was living in Framingham, Massachusetts.
UPDATE October 3 -- The NYT ran a correction, not naming my mother, simply saying that they had omitted one of Justin's divorces.
But this summer's 2009 Confederations Cup and Lions tour, both hosted by the country, are proving a real test.
And not one of you fuckers who read this.
We do know that search directed that person to a blog. We do know the searcher clicked on it in an attempt to find what they needed. And we do know enough about the challenges of autism to know that person is likely not alone in that sentiment.
And that's not only you!
Prioritising is the key - a key never discovered by surprising number of otherwise resolute entrepreneurs. If you will not prioritise your tasks for the day, the week, the month(even for the year) and execute them on the basis of their relative importance, you remain at the mercy of your idle subconscious and happenstance.
Go check out Houseworks, new and old! There is something in there for everyone. :)
Really – who would choose to do this?
That's it from me today - thanks for visiting and see you all again soon!
So the long conservative preoccupation with individual liberty is as central as ever. Critics can and do dismiss advocacy of liberty by rightly observing that there is no such thing as absolute liberty. Liberty of one kind implies constraint of another kind. My liberty to enjoy my life constrains your liberty to murder me, for instance. Such dilemmas can generate much windy discussion among theorists but for conservatives theories are unimpressive. They look instead to tradition and experience to decide just which freedoms are practicable, beneficial and widely desired and supported. They decide what mix of freedoms to support by reference to the laboratory of history. And in the full version of the speech excerpted above President Bush does just that -- turning to American traditions and history to both define and justify the sort of freedom he is advocating.
This week, I am so excited to officially get going!!! I have a few client consults to attend and an exciting project through e-design to work on. Kirsten and I are also planning on putting all of the finishing touches on the model home. I CANNOT wait to share it with you! Let the fun begin:) If you are interested in any services, please contact me for info and pricing!
Type a paragraph length response to this prompt:
“What happened is you!” her mother snapped. Instead of having a night out I was in pain in the hospital. No, I wasn’t happy. I was mad. My last night out was spoiled. ”
innovative SAP solution to fulfill specific customer use cases and to facilitate the customers’ actual IT and solution operations environment.
finding Cassiopeia’s Chair.
I wonder.
forever hang,
Consists of long empty roads
Room by Emma Donoghue
I DROPPED MY iPHONE.
I keep holding out hope that some day I will find
And, recipe cards is not all they have. They also have lots of other adorable clip art available for all those other craft projects you have been meaning to do. Have fun!
There are also reported cases where applicants got as far as an initial interview only to be told that they’d been out of work too long. As with some of the online postings, “too long” is apparently more than six months.
7. I do a bit of painting and drawing in my spare time, local scenes, flog a few here an there.
A discussion then followed the presentation. Johann G. Averbach, M.D. blended "forbidden tendencies" with "bloodthirsty and sexy comic books" and compared comic books with fairy tales, concluding that "the fantastic elements of fairy tales depicts a world far removed from reality", therefore it doesn't harm a child. The last comparison was to Pavlov's dog, "where aggression and sexual desire are stimulated by the presentation of comic book pictures".
C'est tout...
*Hanger- Keep the seam on the fold- attach hanging yarn color to a post dc
Don’t need approval tonight, tonight (You don’t need to ask anyone’s permission to sell your soul away. It’s an individual choice)
I wanted him to poo, but it went bad
P.S. Don’t forget to follow my blog via e-mail or facebook or twitter! I would love to hear more from you guys. Happy watching!
This kind of memory coming from a 20-something of my generation is not uncommon or unique. We learned to vent our feelings in the security of anonymity via the Internet. We learned to pour our hearts out for the public. We did these things frequently and without thinking. We could have been writing books and making our millions, but the majority of us didn’t have that kind of foresight.
How would the prophet have responded to this?
In fact, the punch-ups are almost the signature of Snr Fuente’s inside artwork. He puts so much action and movement into them that they don’t seem like static pictures at all. Later I would work with author Cyril Walker’s material, something I’m sure I acquired a taste for in this tale of double-dealing and double-crossing.
Firstly there's pitch: high trebly noisey tweaks at one end and low floor-shaking bowel busting bass at the other. Most sounds have a definite pitch.
Whether Arsène actually took much consideration of that in appointing the Dutchman is unknown but the responsibility seems to have been positive on van Persie with his best season in terms of fitness and goals. A return to goalscoring ways on Saturday would be most welcome.
Some background on co-ed higher education:
How did this guy think spewing hate would help his cause? He has set gay causes back 20 years with this video. People will hold this up as example of the hatred gays have for straights.
Weekly Wisdom: As baby gets bigger the amount of food you can get gets smaller. Think smart, desert first! Milestone: Weekly countdown is in the single digits, 9 weeks and counting!
The MKRAs and its attendant Key Performance Indicators (KPIs) are about identifying priorities and setting targets for individual Ministers and their respective Ministries.
